





























 CHAPTER I.     Down the Rabbit-Hole
 CHAPTER II.    The Pool of Tears
 CHAPTER III.   A Caucus-Race and a Long Tale
 CHAPTER IV.    The Rabbit Sends in a Little Bill
 CHAPTER IX.    The Mock Turtle’s Story
 CHAPTER V.     Advice from a Caterpillar
 CHAPTER VI.    Pig and Pepper
 CHAPTER VII.   A Mad Tea-Party
 CHAPTER VIII.  The Queen’s Croquet-Ground
 CHAPTER X.     The Lobster Quadrille
 CHAPTER XI.    Who Stole the Tarts?
 CHAPTER XII.   Alice’s Evidence
*** START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK ALICE’S ADVENTURES IN WONDERLAND ***
Alice was beginning to get very tired of sitting by her sister on the
Alice’s Adventures in Wonderland
Author: Lewis Carroll
CHAPTER I.
Character set encoding: UTF-8
Contents
Down the Rabbit-Hole
Down, down, down. Would the fall _never_ come to an end? “I wonder how
Either the well was very deep, or she fell very slowly, for she had
In another moment down went Alice after it, never once considering how
Language: English
Produced by: Arthur DiBianca and David Widger
Release Date: January, 1991 [eBook #11]
So she was considering in her own mind (as well as she could, for the
THE MILLENNIUM FULCRUM EDITION 3.0
The rabbit-hole went straight on like a tunnel for some way, and then
There was nothing so _very_ remarkable in that; nor did Alice think it
This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
Title: Alice’s Adventures in Wonderland
[Illustration]
[Most recently updated: October 12, 2020]
about stopping herself before she found herself falling down a very
at home! Why, I wouldn’t say anything about it, even if I fell off the
bank, and of having nothing to do: once or twice she had peeped into
be four thousand miles down, I think—” (for, you see, Alice had learnt
by Lewis Carroll
close by her.
conversations in it, “and what is the use of a book,” thought Alice
cupboards and book-shelves; here and there she saw maps and pictures
cupboards as she fell past it.
dear! Oh dear! I shall be late!” (when she thought it over afterwards,
deep well.
dipped suddenly down, so suddenly that Alice had not a moment to think
disappointment it was empty: she did not like to drop the jar for fear
field after it, and fortunately was just in time to see it pop down a
getting somewhere near the centre of the earth. Let me see: that would
grand words to say.)
had never before seen a rabbit with either a waistcoat-pocket, or a
hot day made her feel very sleepy and stupid), whether the pleasure of
hung upon pegs. She took down a jar from one of the shelves as she
idea what Latitude was, or Longitude either, but thought they were nice
in the world she was to get out again.
it occurred to her that she ought to have wondered at this, but at the
knowledge, as there was no one to listen to her, still it was good
large rabbit-hole under the hedge.
looked at the sides of the well, and noticed that they were filled with
making a daisy-chain would be worth the trouble of getting up and
many miles I’ve fallen by this time?” she said aloud. “I must be
most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no restrictions
of killing somebody underneath, so managed to put it into one of the
of the Project Gutenberg License included with this eBook or online at
on, Alice started to her feet, for it flashed across her mind that she
passed; it was labelled “ORANGE MARMALADE”, but to her great
picking the daisies, when suddenly a White Rabbit with pink eyes ran
plenty of time as she went down to look about her and to wonder what
practice to say it over) “—yes, that’s about the right distance—but
several things of this sort in her lessons in the schoolroom, and
so _very_ much out of the way to hear the Rabbit say to itself, “Oh
the book her sister was reading, but it had no pictures or
then I wonder what Latitude or Longitude I’ve got to?” (Alice had no
think nothing of tumbling down stairs! How brave they’ll all think me
though this was not a _very_ good opportunity for showing off her
time it all seemed quite natural); but when the Rabbit actually _took a
top of the house!” (Which was very likely true.)
using this eBook.
was going to happen next. First, she tried to look down and make out
watch out of its waistcoat-pocket_, and looked at it, and then hurried
watch to take out of it, and burning with curiosity, she ran across the
what she was coming to, but it was too dark to see anything; then she
whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms
will have to check the laws of the country where you are located before
www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the United States, you
“Well!” thought Alice to herself, “after such a fall as this, I shall
“without pictures or conversations?”
﻿The Project Gutenberg eBook of Alice’s Adventures in Wonderland, by Lewis Carroll

















    *      *      *      *      *      *
(Dinah was the cat.) “I hope they’ll remember her saucer of milk at
(and she tried to curtsey as she spoke—fancy _curtseying_ as you’re
*      *      *      *      *      *      *
*      *      *      *      *      *      *
After a while, finding that nothing more happened, she decided on going
Alice began to get rather sleepy, and went on saying to herself, in a
Alice had been all the way down one side and up the other, trying every
Alice opened the door and found that it led into a small passage, not
Alice was not a bit hurt, and she jumped up on to her feet in a moment:
And so it was indeed: she was now only ten inches high, and her face
Down, down, down. There was nothing else to do, so Alice soon began
However, this bottle was _not_ marked “poison,” so Alice ventured to
It was all very well to say “Drink me,” but the wise little Alice was
Presently she began again. “I wonder if I shall fall right _through_
Suddenly she came upon a little three-legged table, all made of solid
There seemed to be no use in waiting by the little door, so she went
There were doors all round the hall, but they were all locked; and when
_would_ not remember the simple rules their friends had taught them:
an ignorant little girl she’ll think me for asking! No, it’ll never do
and that if you cut your finger _very_ deeply with a knife, it usually
and was just in time to hear it say, as it turned a corner, “Oh my ears
and when she had tired herself out with trying, the poor little thing
and whiskers, how late it’s getting!” She was close behind it when she
any rate a book of rules for shutting people up like telescopes: this
back to the table, half hoping she might find another key on it, or at
before,” said Alice,) and round the neck of the bottle was a paper
behind it was a little door about fifteen inches high: she tried the
best to climb up one of the legs of the table, but it was too slippery;
bleeds; and she had never forgotten that, if you drink much from a
bottle marked “poison,” it is almost certain to disagree with you,
brightened up at the thought that she was now the right size for going
but at any rate it would not open any of them. However, on the second
but, alas! either the locks were too large, or the key was too small,
country is, you know. Please, Ma’am, is this New Zealand or Australia?”
door, she found she had forgotten the little golden key, and when she
door, she walked sadly down the middle, wondering how she was ever to
dreamy sort of way, “Do cats eat bats? Do cats eat bats?” and
eaten up by wild beasts and other unpleasant things, all because they
either question, it didn’t much matter which way she put it. She felt
falling through the air! Do you think you could manage it?) “And what
first thought was that it might belong to one of the doors of the hall;
flame of a candle is like after the candle is blown out, for she could
flavour of cherry-tart, custard, pine-apple, roast turkey, toffee, and
flowers and those cool fountains, but she could not even get her head
from the roof.
get out again.
glad there _was_ no one listening, this time, as it didn’t sound at all
glass; there was nothing on it except a tiny golden key, and Alice’s
happened lately, that Alice had begun to think that very few things
herself in a long, low hall, which was lit up by a row of lamps hanging
hot buttered toast,) she very soon finished it off.
how I wish I could shut up like a telescope! I think I could, if I only
indeed were really impossible.
into the garden at once; but, alas for poor Alice! when she got to the
it. There was not a moment to be lost: away went Alice like the wind,
it: she could see it quite plainly through the glass, and she tried her
knew how to begin.” For, you see, so many out-of-the-way things had
label, with the words “DRINK ME,” beautifully printed on it in large
letters.
little golden key in the lock, and to her great delight it fitted!
long passage, and the White Rabbit was still in sight, hurrying down
much larger than a rat-hole: she knelt down and looked along the
no mice in the air, I’m afraid, but you might catch a bat, and that’s
not going to do _that_ in a hurry. “No, I’ll look first,” she said,
not remember ever having seen such a thing.
out of that dark hall, and wander about among those beds of bright
passage into the loveliest garden you ever saw. How she longed to get
poor Alice, “it would be of very little use without my shoulders. Oh,
said Alice to herself, “in my going out altogether, like a candle. I
sat down and cried.
several nice little histories about children who had got burnt, and
she felt a little nervous about this; “for it might end, you know,”
she looked up, but it was all dark overhead; before her was another
sometimes, “Do bats eat cats?” for, you see, as she couldn’t answer
sooner or later.
such as, that a red-hot poker will burn you if you hold it too long;
talking again. “Dinah’ll miss me very much to-night, I should think!”
taste it, and finding it very nice, (it had, in fact, a sort of mixed
tea-time. Dinah my dear! I wish you were down here with me! There are
telescope.”
that she was dozing off, and had just begun to dream that she was
the earth! How funny it’ll seem to come out among the people that walk
the fall was over.
the right word) “—but I shall have to ask them what the name of the
through the doorway; “and even if my head would go through,” thought
through the little door into that lovely garden. First, however, she
thump! thump! down she came upon a heap of sticks and dry leaves, and
time round, she came upon a low curtain she had not noticed before, and
time she found a little bottle on it, (“which certainly was not here
to ask: perhaps I shall see it written up somewhere.”
turned the corner, but the Rabbit was no longer to be seen: she found
very like a mouse, you know. But do cats eat bats, I wonder?” And here
waited for a few minutes to see if she was going to shrink any further:
walking hand in hand with Dinah, and saying to her very earnestly,
went back to the table for it, she found she could not possibly reach
with their heads downward! The Antipathies, I think—” (she was rather
wonder what I should be like then?” And she tried to fancy what the
“Now, Dinah, tell me the truth: did you ever eat a bat?” when suddenly,
“What a curious feeling!” said Alice; “I must be shutting up like a
“and see whether it’s marked ‘_poison_’ or not”; for she had read























     Alice’s love_).
     _Alice’s Right Foot, Esq., Hearthrug, near the Fender,_ (_with
    *      *      *      *      *      *
    Improve his shining tail,
    On every golden scale!
(for when she looked down at her feet, they seemed to be almost out of
*      *      *      *      *      *      *
*      *      *      *      *      *      *
After a time she heard a little pattering of feet in the distance, and
Alice took up the fan and gloves, and, as the hall was very hot, she
Alice, “and if it makes me grow larger, I can reach the key; and if it
And pour the waters of the Nile
And she went on planning to herself how she would manage it. “They must
CHAPTER II.
Christmas.”
Duchess! Oh! won’t she be savage if I’ve kept her waiting!” Alice felt
Geography. London is the capital of Paris, and Paris is the capital of
I wonder if I’ve been changed in the night? Let me think: was I the
Just then her head struck against the roof of the hall: in fact she was
Let me see: four times five is twelve, and four times six is thirteen,
Oh dear, what nonsense I’m talking!”
Poor Alice! It was as much as she could do, lying down on one side, to
Rabbit came near her, she began, in a low, timid voice, “If you please,
Rabbit returning, splendidly dressed, with a pair of white kid gloves
Rome, and Rome—no, _that’s_ all wrong, I’m certain! I must have been
She ate a little bit, and said anxiously to herself, “Which way? Which
So she set to work, and very soon finished off the cake.
Soon her eye fell on a little glass box that was lying under the table:
The Pool of Tears
a little different. But if I’m not the same, the next question is, Who
and four times seven is—oh dear! I shall never get to twenty at that
and sometimes she scolded herself so severely as to bring tears into
be Mabel, for I know all sorts of things, and she, oh! she knows such a
changed for Mabel! I’ll try and say ‘_How doth the little_—’” and she
cheated herself in a game of croquet she was playing against herself,
crossed her hands on her lap as if she were saying lessons, and began
did not come the same as they used to do:—
for the moment she quite forgot how to speak good English); “now I’m
for this curious child was very fond of pretending to be two people.
four inches deep and reaching half down the hall.
gallons of tears, until there was a large pool all round her, about
gave herself very good advice, (though she very seldom followed it),
get into the garden, and I don’t care which happens!”
go by the carrier,” she thought; “and how funny it’ll seem, sending
great hurry, muttering to himself as he came, “Oh! the Duchess, the
growing, and she was quite surprised to find that she remained the same
had got so much into the way of expecting nothing but out-of-the-way
her eyes; and once she remembered trying to box her own ears for having
herself, to see if she could have been changed for any of them.
hopeless than ever: she sat down and began to cry again.
in one hand and a large fan in the other: he came trotting along in a
in the world am I? Ah, _that’s_ the great puzzle!” And she began
kept fanning herself all the time she went on talking: “Dear, dear! How
key and hurried off to the garden door.
kind to them,” thought Alice, “or perhaps they won’t walk the way I
look through into the garden with one eye; but to get through was more
makes me grow smaller, I can creep under the door; so either way I’ll
myself about you: you must manage the best way you can;—but I must be
now more than nine feet high, and she at once took up the little golden
on in the common way.
opening out like the largest telescope that ever was! Good-bye, feet!”
people! Why, there’s hardly enough of me left to make _one_ respectable
person!”
presents to one’s own feet! And how odd the directions will look!
puzzling it all is! I’ll try if I know all the things I used to know.
queer everything is to-day! And yesterday things went on just as usual.
rate! However, the Multiplication Table doesn’t signify: let’s try
rather sharply; “I advise you to leave off this minute!” She generally
ringlets, and mine doesn’t go in ringlets at all; and I’m sure I can’t
same when I got up this morning? I almost think I can remember feeling
she hastily dried her eyes to see what was coming. It was the White
she opened it, and found in it a very small cake, on which the words
sight, they were getting so far off). “Oh, my poor little feet, I
sir—” The Rabbit started violently, dropped the white kid gloves and
size: to be sure, this generally happens when one eats cake, but Alice
so desperate that she was ready to ask help of any one; so, when the
sure _I_ shan’t be able! I shall be a great deal too far off to trouble
the fan, and skurried away into the darkness as hard as he could go.
things to happen, that it seemed quite dull and stupid for life to go
thinking over all the children she knew that were of the same age as
this moment, I tell you!” But she went on all the same, shedding
to repeat it, but her voice sounded hoarse and strange, and the words
very little! Besides, _she’s_ she, and _I’m_ I, and—oh dear, how
want to go! Let me see: I’ll give them a new pair of boots every
way?”, holding her hand on the top of her head to feel which way it was
wonder who will put on your shoes and stockings for you now, dears? I’m
you,” (she might well say this), “to go on crying in this way! Stop
“But it’s no use now,” thought poor Alice, “to pretend to be two
“Come, there’s no use in crying like that!” said Alice to herself,
“Curiouser and curiouser!” cried Alice (she was so much surprised, that
“EAT ME” were beautifully marked in currants. “Well, I’ll eat it,” said
“How cheerfully he seems to grin,
“How doth the little crocodile
“I’m sure I’m not Ada,” she said, “for her hair goes in such long
“You ought to be ashamed of yourself,” said Alice, “a great girl like















    How neatly spread his claws,
    With gently smiling jaws!”
And welcome little fishes in
As she said these words her foot slipped, and in another moment,
As she said this she looked down at her hands, and was surprised to see
Everything is so out-of-the-way down here, that I should think very
I shall have to go and live in that poky little house, and have next to
I shall only look up and say ‘Who am I then? Tell me that first, and
It was high time to go, for the pool was getting quite crowded with the
Just then she heard something splashing about in the pool a little way
Mouse heard this, it turned round and swam slowly back to her: its face
So she called softly after it, “Mouse dear! Do come back again, and we
_hated_ cats: nasty, low, vulgar things! Don’t let me hear the name
_very_ tired of being all alone here!”
_you_ like cats if you were me?”
a French mouse, come over with William the Conqueror.” (For, with all
a mouse—to a mouse—a mouse—O mouse!”) The Mouse looked at her rather
about her any more if you’d rather not.”
about it. And yet I wish I could show you our cat Dinah: I think you’d
again!”
answer, so Alice went on eagerly: “There is such a nice little dog near
anything had happened.) So she began again: “Où est ma chatte?” which
before, never! And I declare it’s too bad, that it is!”
began: “O Mouse, do you know the way out of this pool? I am very tired
being drowned in my own tears! That _will_ be a queer thing, to be
birds and animals that had fallen into it: there were a Duck and a
burst of tears, “I do wish they _would_ put their heads down! I am so
but it said nothing.
cats.”
conversation. “Are you—are you fond—of—of dogs?” The Mouse did not
door: but, alas! the little door was shut again, and the little golden
dropped it hastily, just in time to avoid shrinking away altogether.
ever,” thought the poor child, “for I never was so small as this
filled with tears again as she went on, “I must be Mabel after all, and
found out that the cause of this was the fan she was holding, and she
fright. “Oh, I beg your pardon!” cried Alice hastily, afraid that she
from her as hard as it could go, and making quite a commotion in the
growing small again.” She got up and went to the table to measure
had hurt the poor animal’s feelings. “I quite forgot you didn’t like
her knowledge of history, Alice had no very clear notion how long ago
her life, and had come to the general conclusion, that wherever you go
here till I’m somebody else’—but, oh dear!” cried Alice, with a sudden
herself by it, and found that, as nearly as she could guess, she was
history, and you’ll understand why it is I hate cats and dogs.”
in the pool, “and she sits purring so nicely by the fire, licking her
inquisitively, and seemed to her to wink with one of its little eyes,
it kills all the rats and—oh dear!” cried Alice in a sorrowful tone,
it must be a walrus or hippopotamus, but then she remembered how small
key was lying on the glass table as before, “and things are worse than
know, and he says it’s so useful, it’s worth a hundred pounds! He says
know, with oh, such long curly brown hair! And it’ll fetch things when
likely it can talk: at any rate, there’s no harm in trying.” So she
made up my mind about it; if I’m Mabel, I’ll stay down here! It’ll be
no toys to play with, and oh! ever so many lessons to learn! No, I’ve
no use their putting their heads down and saying ‘Come up again, dear!’
now about two feet high, and was going on shrinking rapidly: she soon
now for the garden!” and she ran with all speed back to the little
nurse—and she’s such a capital one for catching mice—oh, I beg your
of lodging houses, and behind them a railway station.) However, she
of swimming about here, O Mouse!” (Alice thought this must be the right
of things—I can’t remember half of them—and it belongs to a farmer, you
off, and she swam nearer to make out what it was: at first she thought
our house I should like to show you! A little bright-eyed terrier, you
over, and she felt certain it must be really offended. “We won’t talk
pardon!” cried Alice again, for this time the Mouse was bristling all
paws and washing her face—and she is such a nice soft thing to
pool as it went.
quiet thing,” Alice went on, half to herself, as she swam lazily about
railway,” she said to herself. (Alice had been to the seaside once in
sea, some children digging in the sand with wooden spades, then a row
she had somehow fallen into the sea, “and in that case I can go back by
she remembered having seen in her brother’s Latin Grammar, “A mouse—of
she was nine feet high.
she was now, and she soon made out that it was only a mouse that had
she was talking. “How _can_ I have done that?” she thought. “I must be
slipped in like herself.
soon made out that she was in the pool of tears which she had wept when
splash! she was up to her chin in salt water. Her first idea was that
sudden change, but very glad to find herself still in existence; “and
sudden leap out of the water, and seemed to quiver all over with
sure! However, everything is queer to-day.”
tail. “As if _I_ would talk on such a subject! Our family always
take a fancy to cats if you could only see her. She is such a dear
that she had put on one of the Rabbit’s little white kid gloves while
then, if I like being that person, I’ll come up: if not, I’ll stay down
to find her way out. “I shall be punished for it now, I suppose, by
to on the English coast you find a number of bathing machines in the
trembling voice, “Let us get to the shore, and then I’ll tell you my
was quite pale (with passion, Alice thought), and it said in a low
was the first sentence in her French lesson-book. The Mouse gave a
way of speaking to a mouse: she had never done such a thing before, but
won’t talk about cats or dogs either, if you don’t like them!” When the
you throw them, and it’ll sit up and beg for its dinner, and all sorts
“I wish I hadn’t cried so much!” said Alice, as she swam about, trying
“I won’t indeed!” said Alice, in a great hurry to change the subject of
“I’m afraid I’ve offended it again!” For the Mouse was swimming away
“I’m sure those are not the right words,” said poor Alice, and her eyes
“Not like cats!” cried the Mouse, in a shrill, passionate voice. “Would
“Perhaps it doesn’t understand English,” thought Alice; “I daresay it’s
“That _was_ a narrow escape!” said Alice, a good deal frightened at the
“We indeed!” cried the Mouse, who was trembling down to the end of his
“Well, perhaps not,” said Alice in a soothing tone: “don’t be angry
“Would it be of any use, now,” thought Alice, “to speak to this mouse?
































A Caucus-Race and a Long Tale
Alice had no idea what to do, and in despair she put her hand in her
At last the Mouse, who seemed to be a person of authority among them,
CHAPTER III.
Dodo, a Lory and an Eaglet, and several other curious creatures. Alice
Duck: “it’s generally a frog or a worm. The question is, what did the
First it marked out a race-course, in a sort of circle, (“the exact
Mercia and Northumbria—’”
Mouse in the middle. Alice kept her eyes anxiously fixed on it, for she
Stigand, the patriotic archbishop of Canterbury, found it advisable—’”
The Mouse did not notice this question, but hurriedly went on, “‘—found
The first question of course was, how to get dry again: they had a
They were indeed a queer-looking party that assembled on the bank—the
This question the Dodo could not answer without a great deal of
accustomed to usurpation and conquest. Edwin and Morcar, the earls of
again, the Dodo suddenly called out “The race is over!” and they all
along the course, here and there. There was no “One, two, three, and
archbishop find?”
as you might like to try the thing yourself, some winter day, I will
away,” but they began running when they liked, and left off when they
birds with draggled feathers, the animals with their fur clinging close
called out, “Sit down, all of you, and listen to me! _I’ll_ soon make
confused way, “Prizes! Prizes!”
consultation about this, and after a few minutes it seemed quite
crowded round it, panting, and asking, “But who has won?”
dry me at all.”
felt sure she would catch a bad cold if she did not get dry very soon.
finger; and the whole party at once crowded round her, calling out in a
forehead (the position in which you usually see Shakespeare, in the
is the driest thing I know. Silence all round, if you please! ‘William
it advisable to go with Edgar Atheling to meet William and offer him
know, but the Dodo had paused as if it thought that _somebody_ ought to
led the way, and the whole party swam to the shore.
liked, so that it was not easy to know when the race was over. However,
natural to Alice to find herself talking familiarly with them, as if
not got into it), and handed them round as prizes. There was exactly
of his Normans—’ How are you getting on now, my dear?” it continued,
older than you, and must know better;” and this Alice would not allow
one a-piece, all round.
pictures of him), while the rest waited in silence. At last the Dodo
pocket, and pulled out a box of comfits, (luckily the salt water had
remedies—”
said, “_Everybody_ has won, and all must have prizes.”
shape doesn’t matter,” it said,) and then all the party were placed
she had known them all her life. Indeed, she had quite a long argument
speak, and no one else seemed inclined to say anything.
tell its age, there was no more to be said.
tell you how the Dodo managed it.)
that the best thing to get us dry would be a Caucus-race.”
that the meeting adjourn, for the immediate adoption of more energetic
the Conqueror, whose cause was favoured by the pope, was soon submitted
the Eaglet bent down its head to hide a smile: some of the other birds
the crown. William’s conduct at first was moderate. But the insolence
the earls of Mercia and Northumbria, declared for him: and even
those long words, and, what’s more, I don’t believe you do either!” And
thought, and it sat for a long time with one finger pressed upon its
tittered audibly.
to by the English, who wanted leaders, and had been of late much
to them, and all dripping wet, cross, and uncomfortable.
turning to Alice as it spoke.
what ‘it’ means.”
when they had been running half an hour or so, and were quite dry
with the Lory, who at last turned sulky, and would only say, “I am
without knowing how old it was, and, as the Lory positively refused to
you dry enough!” They all sat down at once, in a large ring, with the
you speak?”
your pocket?” he went on, turning to Alice.
“Ahem!” said the Mouse with an important air, “are you all ready? This
“As wet as ever,” said Alice in a melancholy tone: “it doesn’t seem to
“But she must have a prize herself, you know,” said the Mouse.
“But who is to give the prizes?” quite a chorus of voices asked.
“Found _it_,” the Mouse replied rather crossly: “of course you know
“Found _what_?” said the Duck.
“I beg your pardon!” said the Mouse, frowning, but very politely: “Did
“I know what ‘it’ means well enough, when _I_ find a thing,” said the
“I thought you did,” said the Mouse. “—I proceed. ‘Edwin and Morcar,
“In that case,” said the Dodo solemnly, rising to its feet, “I move
“Not I!” said the Lory hastily.
“Of course,” the Dodo replied very gravely. “What else have you got in
“Only a thimble,” said Alice sadly.
“Speak English!” said the Eaglet. “I don’t know the meaning of half
“Ugh!” said the Lory, with a shiver.
“What I was going to say,” said the Dodo in an offended tone, “was,
“What _is_ a Caucus-race?” said Alice; not that she wanted much to
“Why, _she_, of course,” said the Dodo, pointing to Alice with one
“Why,” said the Dodo, “the best way to explain it is to do it.” (And,




























         denial; We must have a trial: For really this morning I’ve
         go to law: _I_ will prosecute _you_.—Come, I’ll take no
         nothing to do.’ Said the mouse to the cur, ‘Such a trial, dear
         sir, With no jury or judge, would be wasting our breath.’
         try the whole cause, and condemn you to death.’”
         ‘I’ll be judge, I’ll be jury,’ Said cunning old Fury: ‘I’ll
         “Fury said to a mouse, That he met in the house, ‘Let us both
Alice replied eagerly, for she was always ready to talk about her pet:
Alice thought the whole thing very absurd, but they all looked so grave
CHAPTER IV.
However, it was over at last, and they sat down again in a ring, and
It was the White Rabbit, trotting slowly back again, and looking
Lory.
The Mouse only growled in reply.
The Rabbit Sends in a Little Bill
The next thing was to eat the comfits: this caused some noise and
Then they all crowded round her once more, while the Dodo solemnly
This speech caused a remarkable sensation among the party. Some of the
Very soon the Rabbit noticed Alice, as she went hunting about, and
_your_ temper!” “Hold your tongue, Ma!” said the young Crab, a little
a fan! Quick, now!” And Alice was so much frightened that she ran off
addressing nobody in particular. “She’d soon fetch it back!”
alone.
anxiously about as it went, as if it had lost something; and she heard
anxiously about her. “Oh, do let me help to undo it!”
any more!” And here poor Alice began to cry again, for she felt very
at once in the direction it pointed to, without trying to explain the
at the Mouse’s tail; “but why do you call it sad?” And she kept on
bed!” On various pretexts they all moved off, and Alice was soon left
begged the Mouse to tell them something more.
bend, I think?”
birds hurried off at once: one old Magpie began wrapping itself up very
called out to her in an angry tone, “Why, Mary Ann, what _are_ you
can’t think! And oh, I wish you could see her after the birds! Why,
carefully, remarking, “I really must be getting home; the night-air
cat in the world! Oh, my dear Dinah! I wonder if I shall ever see you
cheered.
coming back to finish his story.
confusion, as the large birds complained that they could not taste
doesn’t suit my throat!” and a Canary called out in a trembling voice
doing out here? Run home this moment, and fetch me a pair of gloves and
eagerly, half hoping that the Mouse had changed his mind, and was
ferrets! Where _can_ I have dropped them, I wonder?” Alice guessed in a
gloves, and she very good-naturedly began hunting about for them, but
her daughter “Ah, my dear! Let this be a lesson to you never to lose
her swim in the pool, and the great hall, with the glass table and the
it is you hate—C and D,” she added in a whisper, half afraid that it
it muttering to itself “The Duchess! The Duchess! Oh my dear paws! Oh
little door, had vanished completely.
little pattering of footsteps in the distance, and she looked up
lonely and low-spirited. In a little while, however, she again heard a
moment that it was looking for the fan and the pair of white kid
my fur and whiskers! She’ll get me executed, as sure as ferrets are
presented the thimble, saying “We beg your acceptance of this elegant
puzzling about it while the Mouse was speaking, so that her idea of the
quite out of sight; and an old Crab took the opportunity of saying to
she could.
she’ll eat a little bird as soon as look at it!”
shook its head impatiently, and walked a little quicker.
sighing.
snappishly. “You’re enough to try the patience of an oyster!”
tale was something like this:—
that she did not dare to laugh; and, as she could not think of anything
the others all joined in chorus, “Yes, please do!” but the Mouse only
theirs, and the small ones choked and had to be patted on the back.
they were nowhere to be seen—everything seemed to have changed since
thimble;” and, when it had finished this short speech, they all
to its children, “Come away, my dears! It’s high time you were all in
to say, she simply bowed, and took the thimble, looking as solemn as
tone. “Nobody seems to like her, down here, and I’m sure she’s the best
walking away. “You insult me by talking such nonsense!”
would be offended again.
you know!”
you thinking of?”
“A knot!” said Alice, always ready to make herself useful, and looking
“And who is Dinah, if I might venture to ask the question?” said the
“Dinah’s our cat. And she’s such a capital one for catching mice you
“Hand it over here,” said the Dodo.
“I beg your pardon,” said Alice very humbly: “you had got to the fifth
“I didn’t mean it!” pleaded poor Alice. “But you’re so easily offended,
“I had _not!_” cried the Mouse, sharply and very angrily.
“I shall do nothing of the sort,” said the Mouse, getting up and
“I wish I had our Dinah here, I know I do!” said Alice aloud,
“I wish I hadn’t mentioned Dinah!” she said to herself in a melancholy
“It _is_ a long tail, certainly,” said Alice, looking down with wonder
“Mine is a long and a sad tale!” said the Mouse, turning to Alice, and
“Please come back and finish your story!” Alice called after it; and
“What a pity it wouldn’t stay!” sighed the Lory, as soon as it was
“You are not attending!” said the Mouse to Alice severely. “What are
“You promised to tell me your history, you know,” said Alice, “and why






















Alas! it was too late to wish that! She went on growing, and growing,
And so she went on, taking first one side and then the other, and
By this time she had found her way into a tidy little room with a table
It did so indeed, and much sooner than she had expected: before she had
I’ll just see what this bottle does. I do hope it’ll make me grow large
Luckily for Alice, the little magic bottle had now had its full effect,
Next came an angry voice—the Rabbit’s—“Pat! Pat! Where are you?” And
Presently the Rabbit came up to the door, and tried to open it; but, as
She waited for some time without hearing anything more: at last came a
Still she went on growing, and, as a last resource, she put one arm out
Then came a little pattering of feet on the stairs. Alice knew it was
There was a long silence after this, and Alice could only hear whispers
_can_ have happened to me! When I used to read fairy-tales, I fancied
_could!_ I’m sure _I_ don’t want to stay in here any longer!”
_two_ little shrieks, and more sounds of broken glass. “What a number
a rabbit! I suppose Dinah’ll be sending me on messages next!” And she
again, for really I’m quite tired of being such a tiny little thing!”
again, no wonder she felt unhappy.
all!” “Do as I tell you, you coward!” and at last she spread out her
always growing larger and smaller, and being ordered about by mice and
and had to stoop to save her neck from being broken. She hastily put
and put it to her lips. “I know _something_ interesting is sure to
and she grew no larger: still it was very uncomfortable, and, as there
and very soon had to kneel down on the floor: in another minute there
began fancying the sort of thing that would happen: “‘Miss Alice! Come
but she heard a little shriek and a fall, and a crash of broken glass,
came upon a neat little house, on the door of which was a bright brass
can do no more, whatever happens. What _will_ become of me?”
cucumber-frame, or something of the sort.
don’t think,” Alice went on, “that they’d let Dinah stop in the house
down the bottle, saying to herself “That’s quite enough—I hope I shan’t
drunk half the bottle, she found her head pressing against the ceiling,
drunk quite so much!”
fan and gloves.
for any lesson-books!”
for apples, yer honour!”
from which she concluded that it was just possible it had fallen into a
gloves, and was just going to leave the room, when her eye fell upon a
go round and get in at the window.”
grow any more—As it is, I can’t get out at the door—I do wish I hadn’t
hand again, and made another snatch in the air. This time there were
hand, and made a snatch in the air. She did not get hold of anything,
happen,” she said to herself, “whenever I eat or drink anything; so
help me out of _this!_” (Sounds of more broken glass.)
here directly, and get ready for your walk!’ ‘Coming in a minute,
his fan and gloves—that is, if I can find them.” As she said this, she
house, quite forgetting that she was now about a thousand times as
if it began ordering people about like that!”
in the window, and on it (as she had hoped) a fan and two or three
knocking, and hurried upstairs, in great fear lest she should meet the
large as the Rabbit, and had no reason to be afraid of it.
lessons in here? Why, there’s hardly room for _you_, and no room at all
little bottle that stood near the looking-glass. There was no label
making quite a conversation of it altogether; but after a few minutes
mistake it had made.
now and then; such as, “Sure, I don’t like it, yer honour, at all, at
now? That’ll be a comfort, one way—never to be an old woman—but
nurse! But I’ve got to see that the mouse doesn’t get out.’ Only I
of cucumber-frames there must be!” thought Alice. “I wonder what
of the window, and one foot up the chimney, and said to herself “Now I
one elbow against the door, and the other arm curled round her head.
one! There ought to be a book written about me, that there ought! And
pairs of tiny white kid gloves: she took up the fan and a pair of the
plate with the name “W. RABBIT,” engraved upon it. She went in without
rabbits. I almost wish I hadn’t gone down that rabbit-hole—and yet—and
real Mary Ann, and be turned out of the house before she had found the
seemed to be no sort of chance of her ever getting out of the room
she heard a voice outside, and stopped to listen.
she heard the Rabbit just under the window, she suddenly spread out her
sorrowful tone; “at least there’s no room to grow up any more _here_.”
surprised he’ll be when he finds out who I am! But I’d better take him
that attempt proved a failure. Alice heard it say to itself “Then I’ll
that kind of thing never happened, and now here I am in the middle of
the Rabbit coming to look for her, and she trembled till she shook the
the door opened inwards, and Alice’s elbow was pressed hard against it,
then a voice she had never heard before, “Sure then I’m here! Digging
then—always to have lessons to learn! Oh, I shouldn’t like _that!_”
they’ll do next! As for pulling me out of the window, I only wish they
this time with the words “DRINK ME,” but nevertheless she uncorked it
was not even room for this, and she tried the effect of lying down with
when I grow up, I’ll write one—but I’m grown up now,” she added in a
window!”
yet—it’s rather curious, you know, this sort of life! I do wonder what
“An arm, you goose! Who ever saw one that size? Why, it fills the whole
“But then,” thought Alice, “shall I _never_ get any older than I am
“Digging for apples, indeed!” said the Rabbit angrily. “Here! Come and
“He took me for his housemaid,” she said to herself as she ran. “How
“How queer it seems,” Alice said to herself, “to be going messages for
“It was much pleasanter at home,” thought poor Alice, “when one wasn’t
“Mary Ann! Mary Ann!” said the voice. “Fetch me my gloves this moment!”
“Now tell me, Pat, what’s that in the window?”
“Oh, you foolish Alice!” she answered herself. “How can you learn
“Sure, it does, yer honour: but it’s an arm for all that.”
“Sure, it’s an arm, yer honour!” (He pronounced it “arrum.”)
“Well, it’s got no business there, at any rate: go and take it away!”
“_That_ you won’t!” thought Alice, and, after waiting till she fancied


















Alice heard the Rabbit say, “A barrowful will do, to begin with.”
Alice noticed with some surprise that the pebbles were all turning into
Alice,) “Well, I hardly know—No more, thank ye; I’m better now—but I’m
An enormous puppy was looking down at her with large round eyes, and
Bill’s place for a good deal: this fireplace is narrow, to be sure; but
Hardly knowing what she did, she picked up a little bit of stick, and
Heads below!” (a loud crash)—“Now, who did that?—It was Bill, I
I _think_ I can kick a little!”
It sounded an excellent plan, no doubt, and very neatly and simply
I’ve got to grow up again! Let me see—how _is_ it to be managed? I
Last came a little feeble, squeaking voice, (“That’s Bill,” thought
She drew her foot as far down the chimney as she could, and waited till
She stretched herself up on tiptoe, and peeped over the edge of the
So she swallowed one of the cakes, and was delighted to find that she
The first thing she heard was a general chorus of “There goes Bill!”
The great question certainly was, what? Alice looked all round her at
There was a dead silence instantly, and Alice thought to herself, “I
There was a large mushroom growing near her, about the same height as
This seemed to Alice a good opportunity for making her escape; so she
_some_ change in my size; and as it can’t possibly make me larger, it
a deal too flustered to tell you—all I know is, something comes at me
again!” which produced another dead silence.
against a buttercup to rest herself, and fanned herself with one of the
all its feet at once, with a yelp of delight, and rushed at the stick,
all the while, till at last it sat down a good way off, panting, with
and made believe to worry it; then Alice dodged behind a great thistle,
and till the puppy’s bark sounded quite faint in the distance.
appeared; but she ran off as hard as she could, and soon found herself
arranged; the only difficulty was, that she had not the smallest idea
began shrinking directly. As soon as she was small enough to get
behind it, it occurred to her that she might as well look and see what
called out as loud as she could, “If you do, I’ll set Dinah at you!”
fancy—Who’s to go down the chimney?—Nay, _I_ shan’t! _You_ do
feebly stretching out one paw, trying to touch her. “Poor little
fetch it here, lad!—Here, put ’em up at this corner—No, tie ’em
for the next moment a shower of little pebbles came rattling in at the
great hurry.
head. “If I eat one of these cakes,” she thought, “it’s sure to make
held it out to the puppy; whereupon the puppy jumped into the air off
herself. “Shy, they seem to put everything upon Bill! I wouldn’t be in
herself; and when she had looked under it, and on both sides of it, and
how to set about it; and while she was peering about anxiously among
it!—_That_ I won’t, then!—Bill’s to go down—Here, Bill! the master says
it; but she was terribly frightened all the time at the thought that it
its tongue hanging out of its mouth, and its great eyes half shut.
ladder?—Why, I hadn’t to bring but one; Bill’s got the other—Bill!
leaves: “I should have liked teaching it tricks very much, if—if I’d
like a Jack-in-the-box, and up I goes like a sky-rocket!”
little animals and birds waiting outside. The poor little Lizard, Bill,
little cakes as they lay on the floor, and a bright idea came into her
little way forwards each time and a long way back, and barking hoarsely
looked like the right thing to eat or drink under the circumstances.
might be hungry, in which case it would be very likely to eat her up in
moment to be trampled under its feet, ran round the thistle again; then
must make me smaller, I suppose.”
now—Don’t choke him—How was it, old fellow? What happened to you? Tell
only been the right size to do it! Oh dear! I’d nearly forgotten that
other side, the puppy made another rush at the stick, and tumbled head
over heels in its hurry to get hold of it; then Alice, thinking it was
question is, what?”
roof off.” After a minute or two, they began moving about again, and
rope—Will the roof bear?—Mind that loose slate—Oh, it’s coming down!
rumbling of little cartwheels, and the sound of a good many voices all
safe in a thick wood.
saying to herself “This is Bill,” she gave one sharp kick, and waited
scratching and scrambling about in the chimney close above her: then,
second thing is to find my way into that lovely garden. I think that
set off at once, and ran till she was quite tired and out of breath,
she heard a little animal (she couldn’t guess of what sort it was)
silence, and then another confusion of voices—“Hold up his head—Brandy
something out of a bottle. They all made a rush at Alice the moment she
spite of all her coaxing.
suppose I ought to eat or drink something or other; but the great
talking together: she made out the words: “Where’s the other
the flowers and the blades of grass, but she did not see anything that
the puppy began a series of short charges at the stick, running a very
the trees, a little sharp bark just over her head made her look up in a
then the Rabbit’s voice along—“Catch him, you by the hedge!” then
thing!” said Alice, in a coaxing tone, and she tried hard to whistle to
this,” she said to herself, and shouted out, “You’d better not do that
through the door, she ran out of the house, and found quite a crowd of
to keep herself from being run over; and the moment she appeared on the
to see what would happen next.
together first—they don’t reach half high enough yet—Oh! they’ll do
us all about it!”
very like having a game of play with a cart-horse, and expecting every
wandered about in the wood, “is to grow to my right size again; and the
was in the middle, being held up by two guinea-pigs, who were giving it
was on the top of it.
well enough; don’t be particular—Here, Bill! catch hold of this
will be the best plan.”
window, and some of them hit her in the face. “I’ll put a stop to
wonder what they _will_ do next! If they had any sense, they’d take the
you’re to go down the chimney!”
“A barrowful of _what?_” thought Alice; but she had not long to doubt,
“And yet what a dear little puppy it was!” said Alice, as she leant
“Oh! So Bill’s got to come down the chimney, has he?” said Alice to
“So you did, old fellow!” said the others.
“The first thing I’ve got to do,” said Alice to herself, as she
“We must burn the house down!” said the Rabbit’s voice; and Alice





































    Allow me to sell you a couple?”
    And argued each case with my wife;
    And have grown most uncommonly fat;
    Do you think, at your age, it is right?”
    For anything tougher than suet;
    Pray, how did you manage to do it?”
    Pray, what is the reason of that?”
    Why, I do it again and again.”
    “And your hair has become very white;
    “I feared it might injure the brain;
    “I kept all my limbs very supple
Advice from a Caterpillar
Alice felt a little irritated at the Caterpillar’s making such _very_
Alice folded her hands, and began:—
Alice thought she might as well wait, as she had nothing else to do,
And the muscular strength, which it gave to my jaw,
And yet you incessantly stand on your head—
But, now that I’m perfectly sure I have none,
By the use of this ointment—one shilling the box—
CHAPTER V.
Here was another puzzling question; and as Alice could not think of any
The Caterpillar and Alice looked at each other for some time in
This sounded promising, certainly: Alice turned and came back again.
This was not an encouraging opening for a conversation. Alice replied,
Which brought them back again to the beginning of the conversation.
Yet you finished the goose, with the bones and the beak—
Yet you turned a back-somersault in at the door—
addressed her in a languid, sleepy voice.
after that into a butterfly, I should think you’ll feel it a little
and perhaps after all it might tell her something worth hearing. For
anything else.
came different!” Alice replied in a very melancholy voice.
caterpillar, that was sitting on the top with its arms folded, quietly
changed several times since then.”
could.
different sizes in a day is very confusing.”
good reason, and as the Caterpillar seemed to be in a _very_ unpleasant
have to turn into a chrysalis—you will some day, you know—and then
important to say!”
is, it would feel very queer to _me_.”
its arms, took the hookah out of its mouth again, and said, “So you
mushroom, and her eyes immediately met those of a large blue
not myself, you see.”
queer, won’t you?”
rather shyly, “I—I hardly know, sir, just at present—at least I know
short remarks, and she drew herself up and said, very gravely, “I
silence: at last the Caterpillar took the hookah out of its mouth, and
smoking a long hookah, and taking not the smallest notice of her or of
some minutes it puffed away without speaking, but at last it unfolded
state of mind, she turned away.
think you’re changed, do you?”
think, you ought to tell me who _you_ are, first.”
used—and I don’t keep the same size for ten minutes together!”
who I _was_ when I got up this morning, but I think I must have been
yourself!”
“Can’t remember _what_ things?” said the Caterpillar.
“Come back!” the Caterpillar called after her. “I’ve something
“I can’t explain _myself_, I’m afraid, sir,” said Alice, “because I’m
“I don’t see,” said the Caterpillar.
“In my youth,” Father William replied to his son,
“In my youth,” said his father, “I took to the law,
“In my youth,” said the sage, as he shook his grey locks,
“Is that all?” said Alice, swallowing down her anger as well as she
“It isn’t,” said the Caterpillar.
“I’m afraid I am, sir,” said Alice; “I can’t remember things as I
“I’m afraid I can’t put it more clearly,” Alice replied very politely,
“Keep your temper,” said the Caterpillar.
“No,” said the Caterpillar.
“Not a bit,” said the Caterpillar.
“Repeat, “_You are old, Father William_,’” said the Caterpillar.
“Well, I’ve tried to say “How doth the little busy bee,” but it all
“Well, perhaps you haven’t found it so yet,” said Alice; “but when you
“Well, perhaps your feelings may be different,” said Alice; “all I know
“What do you mean by that?” said the Caterpillar sternly. “Explain
“Who are _you?_” said the Caterpillar.
“Why?” said the Caterpillar.
“You are old, Father William,” the young man said,
“You are old,” said the youth, “and your jaws are too weak
“You are old,” said the youth, “as I mentioned before,
“You!” said the Caterpillar contemptuously. “Who are _you?_”
“for I can’t understand it myself to begin with; and being so many


































    *      *      *      *      *      *
    Be off, or I’ll kick you down stairs!”
    Has lasted the rest of my life.”
    Said his father; “don’t give yourself airs!
    That your eye was as steady as ever;
    What made you so awfully clever?”
*      *      *      *      *      *      *
*      *      *      *      *      *      *
Alice remained looking thoughtfully at the mushroom for a minute,
Alice said nothing: she had never been so much contradicted in her life
As there seemed to be no chance of getting her hands up to her head,
Do you think I can listen all day to such stuff?
She was a good deal frightened by this very sudden change, but she felt
She was moving them about as she spoke, but no result seemed to follow,
The Caterpillar was the first to speak.
This time Alice waited patiently until it chose to speak again. In a
Yet you balanced an eel on the end of your nose—
aloud; and in another moment it was out of sight.
an immense length of neck, which seemed to rise like a stalk out of a
and there was silence for some minutes.
before, and she felt that she was losing her temper.
changed into alarm in another moment, when she found that her shoulders
doesn’t like changing so often, you know.”
except a little shaking among the distant green leaves.
face, and was beating her violently with its wings.
going to dive in among the leaves, which she found to be nothing but
grow shorter.”
had just succeeded in curving it down into a graceful zigzag, and was
hedges,” the Pigeon went on, without attending to her; “but those
her neck would bend about easily in any direction, like a serpent. She
herself.
hiss made her draw back in a hurry: a large pigeon had flown into her
hookah into its mouth and began smoking again.
last she stretched her arms round it as far as they would go, and broke
lefthand bit.
mind,” said Alice: “three inches is such a wretched height to be.”
minute or two the Caterpillar took the hookah out of its mouth and
mouth; but she did it at last, and managed to swallow a morsel of the
mushroom, and crawled away in the grass, merely remarking as it went,
off a bit of the edge with each hand.
offended!”
perfectly round, she found this a very difficult question. However, at
rearing itself upright as it spoke (it was exactly three inches high).
sea of green leaves that lay far below her.
seems to suit them!”
serpents! There’s no pleasing them!”
set to work at once to eat some of the other bit. Her chin was pressed
she tried to get her head down to them, and was delighted to find that
shoulders got to? And oh, my poor hands, how is it I can’t see you?”
so closely against her foot, that there was hardly room to open her
that there was no time to be lost, as she was shrinking rapidly; so she
the right-hand bit to try the effect: the next moment she felt a
the tops of the trees under which she had been wandering, when a sharp
thought of herself, “I wish the creatures wouldn’t be so easily
tone, and added with a kind of sob, “I’ve tried every way, and nothing
trying to make out which were the two sides of it; and as it was
violent blow underneath her chin: it had struck her foot!
were nowhere to be found: all she could see, when she looked down, was
words have got altered.”
yawned once or twice, and shook itself. Then it got down off the
“And now which is which?” she said to herself, and nibbled a little of
“Are you content now?” said the Caterpillar.
“But I’m not used to it!” pleaded poor Alice in a piteous tone. And she
“Come, my head’s free at last!” said Alice in a tone of delight, which
“I _don’t_ know,” said the Caterpillar.
“I have answered three questions, and that is enough,”
“I haven’t the least idea what you’re talking about,” said Alice.
“It is a very good height indeed!” said the Caterpillar angrily,
“It is wrong from beginning to end,” said the Caterpillar decidedly,
“I’m _not_ a serpent!” said Alice indignantly. “Let me alone!”
“I’ve tried the roots of trees, and I’ve tried banks, and I’ve tried
“Not _quite_ right, I’m afraid,” said Alice, timidly; “some of the
“Of the mushroom,” said the Caterpillar, just as if she had asked it
“Oh, I’m not particular as to size,” Alice hastily replied; “only one
“One side of _what?_ The other side of _what?_” thought Alice to
“One side will make you grow taller, and the other side will make you
“Serpent!” screamed the Pigeon.
“Serpent, I say again!” repeated the Pigeon, but in a more subdued
“That is not said right,” said the Caterpillar.
“Well, I should like to be a _little_ larger, sir, if you wouldn’t
“What _can_ all that green stuff be?” said Alice. “And where _have_ my
“What size do you want to be?” it asked.
“You are old,” said the youth, “one would hardly suppose
“You’ll get used to it in time,” said the Caterpillar; and it put the



























Alice laughed so much at this, that she had to run back into the wood
Alice was more and more puzzled, but she thought there was no use in
Alice went timidly up to the door, and knocked.
An invitation for the Duchess to play croquet.”
CHAPTER VI.
Fish-Footman was gone, and the other was sitting on the ground near the
For a minute or two she stood looking at the house, and wondering what
It was so long since she had been anything near the right size, that it
Pig and Pepper
Pigeon, raising its voice to a shriek, “and just as I was thinking I
Queen to play croquet.” The Frog-Footman repeated, in the same solemn
The Fish-Footman began by producing from under his arm a great letter,
Then they both bowed low, and their curls got entangled together.
This was such a new idea to Alice, that she was quite silent for a
_is_ that to be done, I wonder?” As she said this, she came suddenly
_one_ with such a neck as that! No, no! You’re a serpent; and there’s
_this_ size: why, I should frighten them out of their wits!” So she
_yours_: I don’t like them raw.”
about, and crept a little way out of the wood to listen.
all over their heads. She felt very curious to know what it was all
and began talking to herself, as usual. “Come, there’s half my plan
and every now and then she had to stop and untwist it. After a while
and she set to work very carefully, nibbling first at one and then at
and then a great crash, as if a dish or kettle had been broken to
another footman in livery, with a round face, and large eyes like a
are; secondly, because they’re making such a noise inside, no one could
as she could, for her neck kept getting entangled among the branches,
began nibbling at the righthand bit again, and did not venture to go
child; “but little girls eat eggs quite as much as serpents do, you
contempt. “I’ve seen a good many little girls in my time, but never
done now! How puzzling all these changes are! I’m never sure what I’m
door, staring stupidly up into the sky.
down again into its nest. Alice crouched down among the trees as well
felt quite strange at first; but she got used to it in a few minutes,
fish)—and rapped loudly at the door with his knuckles. It was opened by
for fear of their hearing her; and when she next peeped out the
frog; and both footmen, Alice noticed, had powdered hair that curled
from the sky! Ugh, Serpent!”
going to be, from one minute to another! However, I’ve got back to my
haven’t had a wink of sleep these three weeks!”
head. But at any rate he might answer questions.—How am I to get in?”
if you were _inside_, you might knock, and I could let you out, you
invent something!”
know.”
know.” He was looking up into the sky all the time he was speaking, and
looking for eggs, I know _that_ well enough; and what does it matter to
looking for eggs, as it happens; and if I was, I shouldn’t want
me whether you’re a little girl or a serpent?”
minute or two, which gave the Pigeon the opportunity of adding, “You’re
near the house till she had brought herself down to nine inches high.
nearly as large as himself, and this he handed over to the other,
no use denying it. I suppose you’ll be telling me next that you never
noise going on within—a constant howling and sneezing, and every now
otherwise, judging by his face only, she would have called him a
pieces.
possibly hear you.” And certainly there _was_ a most extraordinary
right size: the next thing is, to get into that beautiful garden—how
saying anything more till the Pigeon had finished.
saying, in a solemn tone, “For the Duchess. An invitation from the
see its meaning.
she had succeeded in bringing herself down to her usual height.
she remembered that she still held the pieces of mushroom in her hands,
she said to herself; “his eyes are so _very_ nearly at the top of his
should be free of them at last, they must needs come wriggling down
tasted an egg!”
the number of changes she had gone through that day.
the other, and growing sometimes taller and sometimes shorter, until
they’re a kind of serpent, that’s all I can say.”
this Alice thought decidedly uncivil. “But perhaps he can’t help it,”
to do next, when suddenly a footman in livery came running out of the
tone, only changing the order of the words a little, “From the Queen.
two reasons. First, because I’m on the same side of the door as you
upon an open place, with a little house in it about four feet high.
without attending to her, “if we had the door between us. For instance,
wood—(she considered him to be a footman because he was in livery:
“A likely story indeed!” said the Pigeon in a tone of the deepest
“And just as I’d taken the highest tree in the wood,” continued the
“As if it wasn’t trouble enough hatching the eggs,” said the Pigeon;
“But I’m _not_ a serpent, I tell you!” said Alice. “I’m a—I’m a—”
“I _have_ tasted eggs, certainly,” said Alice, who was a very truthful
“I don’t believe it,” said the Pigeon; “but if they do, why then
“It matters a good deal to _me_,” said Alice hastily; “but I’m not
“I—I’m a little girl,” said Alice, rather doubtfully, as she remembered
“I’m very sorry you’ve been annoyed,” said Alice, who was beginning to
“Please, then,” said Alice, “how am I to get in?”
“There might be some sense in your knocking,” the Footman went on
“There’s no sort of use in knocking,” said the Footman, “and that for
“Well! _What_ are you?” said the Pigeon. “I can see you’re trying to
“Well, be off, then!” said the Pigeon in a sulky tone, as it settled
“Whoever lives there,” thought Alice, “it’ll never do to come upon them
“but I must be on the look-out for serpents night and day! Why, I



































    And beat him when he sneezes:
    Because he knows it teases.”
    I beat him when he sneezes;
(In which the cook and the baby joined):
Alice did not at all like the tone of this remark, and thought it would
Alice glanced rather anxiously at the cook, to see if she meant to take
At this moment the door of the house opened, and a large plate came
CHORUS.
He only does it to annoy,
It was, no doubt: only Alice did not like to be told so. “It’s really
It’s enough to drive one crazy!”
She said the last word with such sudden violence that Alice quite
The Footman seemed to think this a good opportunity for repeating his
The door led right into a large kitchen, which was full of smoke from
There was certainly too much of it in the air. Even the Duchess sneezed
While the Duchess sang the second verse of the song, she kept tossing
alternately without a moment’s pause. The only things in the kitchen
and broke to pieces against one of the trees behind him.
as if nothing had happened.
baby, and not to her, so she took courage, and went on again:—
be as well to introduce some other subject of conversation. While she
be listening, so she went on again: “Twenty-four hours, I _think_; or
days and days.”
dreadful,” she muttered to herself, “the way all the creatures argue.
earth takes twenty-four hours to turn round on its axis—”
figures!” And with that she began nursing her child again, singing a
fire, and at once set to work throwing everything within her reach at
get an opportunity of showing off a little of her knowledge. “Just
growl, “the world would go round a deal faster than it does.”
herself, as well as she could for sneezing.
in an agony of terror. “Oh, there goes his _precious_ nose!” as an
in the middle, nursing a baby; the cook was leaning over the fire,
is it twelve? I—”
jumped; but she saw in another moment that it was addressed to the
know that cats _could_ grin.”
not quite sure whether it was good manners for her to speak first, “why
occasionally; and as for the baby, it was sneezing and howling
off.
on the hearth and grinning from ear to ear.
one end to the other: the Duchess was sitting on a three-legged stool
perfectly idiotic!” And she opened the door and went in.
pleased to have got into a conversation.
question, you know.”
remark, with variations. “I shall sit here,” he said, “on and off, for
she repeated, aloud.
shower of saucepans, plates, and dishes. The Duchess took no notice of
skimming out, straight at the Footman’s head: it just grazed his nose,
sort of lullaby to it as she did so, and giving it a violent shake at
stirring a large cauldron which seemed to be full of soup.
that Alice could hardly hear the words:—
that did not sneeze, were the cook, and a large cat which was sitting
that it was quite impossible to say whether the blows hurt it or not.
the Duchess and the baby—the fire-irons came first; then followed a
the baby violently up and down, and the poor little thing howled so,
the end of every line:
the hint; but the cook was busily stirring the soup, and seemed not to
them even when they hit her; and the baby was howling so much already,
think of what work it would make with the day and night! You see the
unusually large saucepan flew close by it, and very nearly carried it
was trying to fix on one, the cook took the cauldron of soup off the
your cat grins like that?”
“Anything you like,” said the Footman, and began whistling.
“But what am _I_ to do?” said Alice.
“How am I to get in?” asked Alice again, in a louder tone.
“I didn’t know that Cheshire cats always grinned; in fact, I didn’t
“I don’t know of any that do,” Alice said very politely, feeling quite
“I shall sit here,” the Footman remarked, “till tomorrow—”
“I speak severely to my boy,
“If everybody minded their own business,” the Duchess said in a hoarse
“It’s a Cheshire cat,” said the Duchess, “and that’s why. Pig!”
“Oh, _please_ mind what you’re doing!” cried Alice, jumping up and down
“Oh, don’t bother _me_,” said the Duchess; “I never could abide
“Oh, there’s no use in talking to him,” said Alice desperately: “he’s
“Please would you tell me,” said Alice, a little timidly, for she was
“Speak roughly to your little boy,
“Talking of axes,” said the Duchess, “chop off her head!”
“There’s certainly too much pepper in that soup!” Alice said to
“They all can,” said the Duchess; “and most of ’em do.”
“Which would _not_ be an advantage,” said Alice, who felt very glad to
“Wow! wow! wow!”
“You don’t know much,” said the Duchess; “and that’s a fact.”
“_Are_ you to get in at all?” said the Footman. “That’s the first
“—or next day, maybe,” the Footman continued in the same tone, exactly


































    The pepper when he pleases!”
Alice caught the baby with some difficulty, as it was a queer-shaped
Alice didn’t think that proved it at all; however, she went on “And how
Alice felt that this could not be denied, so she tried another
Alice was just beginning to think to herself, “Now, what am I to do
As soon as she had made out the proper way of nursing it, (which was to
CHORUS.
For he can thoroughly enjoy
March Hare. Visit either you like: they’re both mad.”
No, there were no tears. “If you’re going to turn into a pig, my dear,”
Queen to-day?”
So she set the little creature down, and felt quite relieved to see it
The Cat only grinned when it saw Alice. It looked good-natured, she
The baby grunted again, and Alice looked very anxiously into its face
You’re mad.”
a Hatter: and in _that_ direction,” waving the other paw, “lives a
a _very_ turn-up nose, much more like a snout than a real nose; also
a pig, and she felt that it would be quite absurd for her to carry it
a tree a few yards off.
and wag my tail when I’m angry. Therefore I’m mad.”
and wags its tail when it’s pleased. Now _I_ growl when I’m pleased,
children she knew, who might do very well as pigs, and was just saying
croquet with the Queen,” and she hurried out of the room. The cook
do you know that you’re mad?”
ear and left foot, so as to prevent its undoing itself,) she carried it
enough.”
expressing yourself.”
felt that it ought to be treated with respect.
flinging the baby at her as she spoke. “I must go and get ready to play
further.
herself, “it would have made a dreadfully ugly child: but it makes
its eyes were getting extremely small for a baby: altogether Alice did
itself up and straightening itself out again, so that altogether, for
little creature, and held out its arms and legs in all directions,
little thing grunted in reply (it had left off sneezing by this time).
murder to leave it behind?” She said the last words out loud, and the
not like the look of the thing at all. “But perhaps it was only
now!” The poor little thing sobbed again (or grunted, it was impossible
out into the open air. “If I don’t take this child away with me,”
question. “What sort of people live about here?”
rather a handsome pig, I think.” And she began thinking over other
said Alice, seriously, “I’ll have nothing more to do with you. Mind
snorting like a steam-engine when she caught it, and kept doubling
sobbing,” she thought, and looked into its eyes again, to see if there
the first minute or two, it was as much as she could do to hold it.
there could be _no_ mistake about it: it was neither more nor less than
thought Alice, “they’re sure to kill it in a day or two: wouldn’t it be
thought: still it had _very_ long claws and a great many teeth, so she
threw a frying-pan after her as she went out, but it just missed her.
to herself, “if one only knew the right way to change them—” when she
to say which), and they went on for some while in silence.
to see what was the matter with it. There could be no doubt that it had
trot away quietly into the wood. “If it had grown up,” she said to
twist it up into a sort of knot, and then keep tight hold of its right
violently, that she looked down into its face in some alarm. This time
was a little startled by seeing the Cheshire Cat sitting on a bough of
were any tears.
whether it would like the name: however, it only grinned a little
wider. “Come, it’s pleased so far,” thought Alice, and she went on.
with this creature when I get it home?” when it grunted again, so
yet.”
“But I don’t want to go among mad people,” Alice remarked.
“Call it what you like,” said the Cat. “Do you play croquet with the
“Cheshire Puss,” she began, rather timidly, as she did not at all know
“Don’t grunt,” said Alice; “that’s not at all a proper way of
“Here! you may nurse it a bit, if you like!” the Duchess said to Alice,
“How do you know I’m mad?” said Alice.
“I don’t much care where—” said Alice.
“I should like it very much,” said Alice, “but I haven’t been invited
“I suppose so,” said Alice.
“In _that_ direction,” the Cat said, waving its right paw round, “lives
“Oh, you can’t help that,” said the Cat: “we’re all mad here. I’m mad.
“Oh, you’re sure to do that,” said the Cat, “if you only walk long
“That depends a good deal on where you want to get to,” said the Cat.
“Then it doesn’t matter which way you go,” said the Cat.
“To begin with,” said the Cat, “a dog’s not mad. You grant that?”
“Well, then,” the Cat went on, “you see, a dog growls when it’s angry,
“Would you tell me, please, which way I ought to go from here?”
“Wow! wow! wow!”
“You must be,” said the Cat, “or you wouldn’t have come here.”
“You’ll see me there,” said the Cat, and vanished.
“_I_ call it purring, not growling,” said Alice.
“just like a star-fish,” thought Alice. The poor little thing was
“—so long as I get _somewhere_,” Alice added as an explanation.




































A Mad Tea-Party
Alice coming. “There’s _plenty_ of room!” said Alice indignantly, and
Alice for some time with great curiosity, and this was his first
Alice looked all round the table, but there was nothing on it but tea.
Alice thought over all she could remember about ravens and
Alice waited a little, half expecting to see it again, but it did not
Alice was not much surprised at this, she was getting so used to queer
CHAPTER VII.
I almost wish I’d gone to see the Hatter instead!”
I get’ is the same thing as ‘I get what I like’!”
I suppose it doesn’t mind.”
March Hare and the Hatter were having tea at it: a Dormouse was sitting
She had not gone much farther before she came in sight of the house of
The Hatter opened his eyes very wide on hearing this; but all he _said_
The Hatter was the first to break the silence. “What day of the month
The table was a large one, but the three were all crowded together at
There was a table set out under a tree in front of the house, and the
again, sitting on a branch of a tree.
and holding it to his ear.
and vanishing so suddenly: you make one quite giddy.”
appear, and after a minute or two she walked on in the direction in
as ‘I sleep when I breathe’!”
beginning with the end of the tail, and ending with the grin, which
begun asking riddles.—I believe I can guess that,” she added aloud.
between them, fast asleep, and the other two were using it as a
chimneys were shaped like ears and the roof was thatched with fur. It
conversation dropped, and the party sat silent for a minute, while
cushion, resting their elbows on it, and talking over its head. “Very
forgotten to ask.”
grin without a cat! It’s the most curious thing I ever saw in my life!”
in a natural way.
is it?” he said, turning to Alice: he had taken his watch out of his
it suddenly appeared again.
many more than three.”
nibbled some more of the lefthand bit of mushroom, and raised herself
one corner of it: “No room! No room!” they cried out when they saw
perhaps as this is May it won’t be raving mad—at least not so mad as it
pocket, and was looking at it uneasily, shaking it every now and then,
remained some time after the rest of it had gone.
said to herself; “the March Hare will be much the most interesting, and
say that ‘I see what I eat’ is the same thing as ‘I eat what I see’!”
say—that’s the same thing, you know.”
severity; “it’s very rude.”
she sat down in a large arm-chair at one end of the table.
speech.
talking in his sleep, “that ‘I breathe when I sleep’ is the same thing
the March Hare.
the March Hare.
the March Hare: she thought it must be the right house, because the
things happening. While she was looking at the place where it had been,
timidly, saying to herself “Suppose it should be raving mad after all!
to about two feet high: even then she walked up towards it rather
uncomfortable for the Dormouse,” thought Alice; “only, as it’s asleep,
was in March.” As she said this, she looked up, and there was the Cat
was so large a house, that she did not like to go nearer till she had
was, “Why is a raven like a writing-desk?”
which the March Hare was said to live. “I’ve seen hatters before,” she
writing-desks, which wasn’t much.
“All right,” said the Cat; and this time it vanished quite slowly,
“By-the-bye, what became of the baby?” said the Cat. “I’d nearly
“Come, we shall have some fun now!” thought Alice. “I’m glad they’ve
“Did you say pig, or fig?” said the Cat.
“Do you mean that you think you can find out the answer to it?” said
“Exactly so,” said Alice.
“Have some wine,” the March Hare said in an encouraging tone.
“I didn’t know it was _your_ table,” said Alice; “it’s laid for a great
“I do,” Alice hastily replied; “at least—at least I mean what I
“I don’t see any wine,” she remarked.
“I said pig,” replied Alice; “and I wish you wouldn’t keep appearing
“I thought it would,” said the Cat, and vanished again.
“It _is_ the same thing with you,” said the Hatter, and here the
“It turned into a pig,” Alice quietly said, just as if it had come back
“It wasn’t very civil of you to sit down without being invited,” said
“Not the same thing a bit!” said the Hatter. “You might just as well
“Then it wasn’t very civil of you to offer it,” said Alice angrily.
“Then you should say what you mean,” the March Hare went on.
“There isn’t any,” said the March Hare.
“Well! I’ve often seen a cat without a grin,” thought Alice; “but a
“You might just as well say,” added the Dormouse, who seemed to be
“You might just as well say,” added the March Hare, “that ‘I like what
“You should learn not to make personal remarks,” Alice said with some
“Your hair wants cutting,” said the Hatter. He had been looking at








































                    Twinkle, twinkle—’”
(“I only wish it was,” the March Hare said to itself in a whisper.)
A bright idea came into Alice’s head. “Is that the reason so many
Alice considered a little, and then said “The fourth.”
Alice felt dreadfully puzzled. The Hatter’s remark seemed to have no
Alice had been looking over his shoulder with some curiosity. “What a
Alice sighed wearily. “I think you might do something better with the
Here the Dormouse shook itself, and began singing in its sleep
How I wonder what you’re at!’
Like a tea-tray in the sky.
Now, if you only kept on good terms with him, he’d do almost anything
Queen jumped up and bawled out, ‘He’s murdering the time! Off with his
The Dormouse shook its head impatiently, and said, without opening its
The Hatter shook his head mournfully. “Not I!” he replied. “We
The March Hare took the watch and looked at it gloomily: then he dipped
You know the song, perhaps?”
about wasting _it_. It’s _him_.”
again.
and we’ve no time to wash the things between whiles.”
answers.”
contemptuously. “I dare say you never even spoke to Time!”
do a thing I ask! It’s always six o’clock now.”
eyes, “Of course, of course; just what I was going to remark myself.”
funny watch!” she remarked. “It tells the day of the month, and doesn’t
given by the Queen of Hearts, and I had to sing
had to pinch it to make it stop.
half-past one as long as you liked.”
head!’”
hint to Time, and round goes the clock in a twinkling! Half-past one,
hot tea upon its nose.
it into his cup of tea, and looked at it again: but he could think of
nothing better to say than his first remark, “It was the _best_ butter,
quarrelled last March—just before _he_ went mad, you know—” (pointing
shouldn’t be hungry for it, you know.”
sort of meaning in it, and yet it was certainly English. “I don’t quite
stays the same year for such a long time together.”
tea-things are put out here?” she asked.
tell what o’clock it is!”
the morning, just time to begin lessons: you’d only have to whisper a
the works!” he added looking angrily at the March Hare.
time for dinner!”
time when I learn music.”
time,” she said, “than waste it in asking riddles that have no
understand you,” she said, as politely as she could.
with his tea spoon at the March Hare,) “—it was at the great concert
year it is?”
you know.”
you liked with the clock. For instance, suppose it were nine o’clock in
‘Twinkle, twinkle, little bat!
‘Up above the world you fly,
“Ah! that accounts for it,” said the Hatter. “He won’t stand beating.
“And ever since that,” the Hatter went on in a mournful tone, “he won’t
“Have you guessed the riddle yet?” the Hatter said, turning to Alice
“How dreadfully savage!” exclaimed Alice.
“I don’t know what you mean,” said Alice.
“I haven’t the slightest idea,” said the Hatter.
“If you knew Time as well as I do,” said the Hatter, “you wouldn’t talk
“Is that the way _you_ manage?” Alice asked.
“It goes on, you know,” the Hatter continued, “in this way:—
“It was the _best_ butter,” the March Hare meekly replied.
“I’ve heard something like it,” said Alice.
“No, I give it up,” Alice replied: “what’s the answer?”
“Nor I,” said the March Hare.
“Not at first, perhaps,” said the Hatter: “but you could keep it to
“Of course not,” Alice replied very readily: “but that’s because it
“Of course you don’t!” the Hatter said, tossing his head
“Perhaps not,” Alice cautiously replied: “but I know I have to beat
“That would be grand, certainly,” said Alice thoughtfully: “but then—I
“The Dormouse is asleep again,” said the Hatter, and he poured a little
“Then you keep moving round, I suppose?” said Alice.
“Two days wrong!” sighed the Hatter. “I told you butter wouldn’t suit
“Well, I’d hardly finished the first verse,” said the Hatter, “when the
“Which is just the case with _mine_,” said the Hatter.
“Why should it?” muttered the Hatter. “Does _your_ watch tell you what
“Yes, but some crumbs must have got in as well,” the Hatter grumbled:
“Yes, that’s it,” said the Hatter with a sigh: “it’s always tea-time,
“_Twinkle, twinkle, twinkle, twinkle_—” and went on so long that they
“you shouldn’t have put it in with the bread-knife.”







































Alice did not quite know what to say to this: so she helped herself to
Alice did not wish to offend the Dormouse again, so she began very
Alice tried to fancy to herself what such an extraordinary ways of
Alice was silent.
Hatter and the March Hare went “Sh! sh!” and the Dormouse sulkily
He moved on as he spoke, and the Dormouse followed him: the March Hare
The Dormouse again took a minute or two to think about it, and then
The Dormouse had closed its eyes by this time, and was going off into a
The Dormouse slowly opened his eyes. “I wasn’t asleep,” he said in a
This answer so confused poor Alice, that she let the Dormouse go on for
advantage from the change: and Alice was a good deal worse off than
before it’s done.”
before, as the March Hare had just upset the milk-jug into his plate.
cautiously: “But I don’t understand. Where did they draw the treacle
dare say there may be _one_.”
doze; but, on being pinched by the Hatter, it woke up again with a
from?”
go on. “And so these three little sisters—they were learning to draw,
hoarse, feeble voice: “I heard every word you fellows were saying.”
in a great hurry; “and their names were Elsie, Lacie, and Tillie; and
in questions of eating and drinking.
its eyes, for it was getting very sleepy; “and they drew all manner of
little shriek, and went on: “—that begins with an M, such as
living would be like, but it puzzled her too much, so she went on: “But
mouse-traps, and the moon, and memory, and muchness—you know you say
moved into the Dormouse’s place, and Alice rather unwillingly took the
on.”
place of the March Hare. The Hatter was the only one who got any
proposal.
remarked, “If you can’t be civil, you’d better finish the story for
repeated her question. “Why did they live at the bottom of a well?”
said, “It was a treacle-well.”
some tea and bread-and-butter, and then turned to the Dormouse, and
some time without interrupting it.
take _more_ than nothing.”
take more.”
they lived at the bottom of a well—”
they pinched it on both sides at once.
things are “much of a muchness”—did you ever see such a thing as a
things—everything that begins with an M—”
think you could draw treacle out of a treacle-well—eh, stupid?”
to ask.
to notice this last remark.
two.
why did they live at the bottom of a well?”
you know—”
yourself.”
“And be quick about it,” added the Hatter, “or you’ll be asleep again
“But they were _in_ the well,” Alice said to the Dormouse, not choosing
“But what happens when you come to the beginning again?” Alice ventured
“Exactly so,” said the Hatter: “as the things get used up.”
“I want a clean cup,” interrupted the Hatter: “let’s all move one place
“I’m afraid I don’t know one,” said Alice, rather alarmed at the
“I’m getting tired of this. I vote the young lady tells us a story.”
“I’ve had nothing yet,” Alice replied in an offended tone, “so I can’t
“No, please go on!” Alice said very humbly; “I won’t interrupt again. I
“Nobody asked _your_ opinion,” said Alice.
“Of course they were,” said the Dormouse; “—well in.”
“Once upon a time there were three little sisters,” the Dormouse began
“One, indeed!” said the Dormouse indignantly. However, he consented to
“So they were,” said the Dormouse; “_very_ ill.”
“Suppose we change the subject,” the March Hare interrupted, yawning.
“Take some more tea,” the March Hare said to Alice, very earnestly.
“Tell us a story!” said the March Hare.
“Then the Dormouse shall!” they both cried. “Wake up, Dormouse!” And
“There’s no such thing!” Alice was beginning very angrily, but the
“They couldn’t have done that, you know,” Alice gently remarked;
“They lived on treacle,” said the Dormouse, after thinking a minute or
“They were learning to draw,” the Dormouse went on, yawning and rubbing
“Treacle,” said the Dormouse, without considering at all this time.
“What did they draw?” said Alice, quite forgetting her promise.
“What did they live on?” said Alice, who always took a great interest
“Who’s making personal remarks now?” the Hatter asked triumphantly.
“Why not?” said the March Hare.
“Why with an M?” said Alice.
“Yes, please do!” pleaded Alice.
“You can draw water out of a water-well,” said the Hatter; “so I should
“You mean you can’t take _less_,” said the Hatter: “it’s very easy to
“they’d have been ill.”




























(she had kept a piece of it in her pocket) till she was about a foot
A large rose-tree stood near the entrance of the garden: the roses
Alice was rather doubtful whether she ought not to lie down on her face
Alice, she went on, “What’s your name, child?”
CHAPTER VIII.
First came ten soldiers carrying clubs; these were all shaped like the
Five and Seven said nothing, but looked at Two. Two began in a low
Just as she said this, she noticed that one of the trees had a door
Knave of Hearts, who only bowed and smiled in reply.
On which Seven looked up and said, “That’s right, Five! Always lay the
Once more she found herself in the long hall, and close to the little
Seven flung down his brush, and had just begun “Well, of all the unjust
The Queen’s Croquet-Ground
This piece of rudeness was more than Alice could bear: she got up in
When the procession came opposite to Alice, they all stopped and looked
_red_ rose-tree, and we put a white one in by mistake; and if the Queen
all my life!”
all. I needn’t be afraid of them!”
and Alice looked round, eager to see the Queen.
and all of them bowed low.
and among them Alice recognised the White Rabbit: it was talking in a
and began by taking the little golden key, and unlocking the door that
and the cool fountains.
and waited.
at her, and the Queen said severely “Who is this?” She said it to the
blame on others!”
bringing the cook tulip-roots instead of onions.”
but she added, to herself, “Why, they’re only a pack of cards, after
by without noticing her. Then followed the Knave of Hearts, carrying
corners: next the ten courtiers; these were ornamented all over with
diamonds, and walked two and two, as the soldiers did. After these came
drawing of a muchness?”
elbow.”
everything’s curious today. I think I may as well go in at once.” And
faces, so that they couldn’t see it?” So she stood still where she was,
glass table. “Now, I’ll manage better this time,” she said to herself,
grand procession, came THE KING AND QUEEN OF HEARTS.
great disgust, and walked off; the Dormouse fell asleep instantly, and
growing on it were white, but there were three gardeners at it, busily
herself at last in the beautiful garden, among the bright flower-beds
high: then she walked down the little passage: and _then_—she found
hurried nervous manner, smiling at everything that was said, and went
in she went.
jumping merrily along hand in hand, in couples: they were all
leading right into it. “That’s very curious!” she thought. “But
led into the garden. Then she went to work nibbling at the mushroom
like that!”
like the three gardeners, but she could not remember ever having heard
looked back once or twice, half hoping that they would call after her:
moment Five, who had been anxiously looking across the garden, called
neither of the others took the least notice of her going, though she
of such a rule at processions; “and besides, what would be the use of a
one of them say, “Look out now, Five! Don’t go splashing paint over me
or courtiers, or three of her own children.
ornamented with hearts. Next came the guests, mostly Kings and Queens,
out “The Queen! The Queen!” and the three gardeners instantly threw
painting them red. Alice thought this a very curious thing, and she
painting those roses?”
procession,” thought she, “if people had all to lie down upon their
the King’s crown on a crimson velvet cushion; and, last of all this
the last time she saw them, they were trying to put the Dormouse into
the pack, she could not tell whether they were gardeners, or soldiers,
the royal children; there were ten of them, and the little dears came
the teapot.
their faces, and the pattern on their backs was the same as the rest of
them, and he checked himself suddenly: the others looked round also,
themselves flat upon their faces. There was a sound of many footsteps,
things—” when his eye chanced to fall upon Alice, as she stood watching
think—”
three gardeners, oblong and flat, with their hands and feet at the
voice, “Why the fact is, you see, Miss, this here ought to have been a
was to find it out, we should all have our heads cut off, you know. So
way through the wood. “It’s the stupidest tea-party I ever was at in
went nearer to watch them, and just as she came up to them she heard
who were lying round the rose-tree; for, you see, as they were lying on
yesterday you deserved to be beheaded!”
you see, Miss, we’re doing our best, afore she comes, to—” At this
“And who are _these?_” said the Queen, pointing to the three gardeners
“At any rate I’ll never go _there_ again!” said Alice as she picked her
“How should _I_ know?” said Alice, surprised at her own courage. “It’s
“I couldn’t help it,” said Five, in a sulky tone; “Seven jogged my
“Idiot!” said the Queen, tossing her head impatiently; and, turning to
“My name is Alice, so please your Majesty,” said Alice very politely;
“Really, now you ask me,” said Alice, very much confused, “I don’t
“That’s none of _your_ business, Two!” said Seven.
“Then you shouldn’t talk,” said the Hatter.
“What for?” said the one who had spoken first.
“Would you tell me,” said Alice, a little timidly, “why you are
“Yes, it _is_ his business!” said Five, “and I’ll tell him—it was for
“_You’d_ better not talk!” said Five. “I heard the Queen say only






























Alice began to feel very uneasy: to be sure, she had not as yet had any
Queen said—”
She was looking about for some way of escape, and wondering whether she
The King laid his hand upon her arm, and timidly said “Consider, my
The Knave did so, very carefully, with one foot.
The Queen turned angrily away from him, and said to the Knave “Turn
The Queen turned crimson with fury, and, after glaring at her for a
The chief difficulty Alice found at first was in managing her flamingo:
The players all played at once without waiting for turns, quarrelling
The soldiers were silent, and looked at Alice, as the question was
all the while, and fighting for the hedgehogs; and in a very short time
always getting up and walking off to other parts of the ground, Alice
anxiously over his shoulder as he spoke, and then raised himself upon
appearance in the air: it puzzled her very much at first, but, after
began. Alice thought she had never seen such a curious croquet-ground
bursting out laughing: and when she had got its head down, and was
could get away without being seen, when she noticed a curious
dear: she is only a child!”
dispute with the Queen, but she knew that it might happen any minute,
down on one knee as he spoke, “we were trying—”
enough for it to speak with.
evidently meant for her.
flower-pot that stood near. The three soldiers wandered about for a
fond of beheading people here; the great wonder is, that there’s any
gardeners instantly jumped up, and began bowing to the King, the Queen,
going to begin again, it was very provoking to find that the hedgehog
had got its neck nicely straightened out, and was going to give the
had unrolled itself, and was in the act of crawling away: besides all
hedgehog a blow with its head, it _would_ twist itself round and look
hedgehogs, the mallets live flamingoes, and the soldiers had to double
here?”
in her life; it was all ridges and furrows; the balls were live
in reply.
minute or two, looking for them, and then quietly marched off after the
minute.
moment like a wild beast, screamed “Off with her head! Off—”
no business of _mine_.”
one left alive!”
other; however, they got settled down in a minute or two, and the game
others.
people began running about in all directions, tumbling up against each
scream of laughter. “Oh, hush!” the Rabbit whispered in a frightened
sentence of execution.”
she succeeded in getting its body tucked away, comfortably enough,
shouting “Off with his head!” or “Off with her head!” about once in a
silent.
soldiers remaining behind to execute the unfortunate gardeners, who ran
soon came to the conclusion that it was a very difficult game indeed.
the Queen was in a furious passion, and went stamping about, and
the royal children, and everybody else.
them over!”
themselves up and to stand on their hands and feet, to make the arches.
this, there was generally a ridge or furrow in the way wherever she
tiptoe, put his mouth close to her ear, and whispered “She’s under
to Alice for protection.
to herself “It’s the Cheshire Cat: now I shall have somebody to talk
to.”
tone. “The Queen will hear you! You see, she came rather late, and the
turning to the rose-tree, she went on, “What _have_ you been doing
under her arm, with its legs hanging down, but generally, just as she
up in her face, with such a puzzled expression that she could not help
walking by the White Rabbit, who was peeping anxiously into her face.
wanted to send the hedgehog to, and, as the doubled-up soldiers were
watching it a minute or two, she made it out to be a grin, and she said
wondering very much what would happen next.
‘What for?’”
“Are their heads off?” shouted the Queen.
“Come on, then!” roared the Queen, and Alice joined the procession,
“Did you say ‘What a pity!’?” the Rabbit asked.
“Get to your places!” shouted the Queen in a voice of thunder, and
“Get up!” said the Queen, in a shrill, loud voice, and the three
“How are you getting on?” said the Cat, as soon as there was mouth
“Hush! Hush!” said the Rabbit in a low, hurried tone. He looked
“It’s—it’s a very fine day!” said a timid voice at her side. She was
“Leave off that!” screamed the Queen. “You make me giddy.” And then,
“May it please your Majesty,” said Two, in a very humble tone, going
“No, I didn’t,” said Alice: “I don’t think it’s at all a pity. I said
“Nonsense!” said Alice, very loudly and decidedly, and the Queen was
“Off with their heads!” and the procession moved on, three of the
“She boxed the Queen’s ears—” the Rabbit began. Alice gave a little
“That’s right!” shouted the Queen. “Can you play croquet?”
“Their heads are gone, if it please your Majesty!” the soldiers shouted
“Very,” said Alice: “—where’s the Duchess?”
“What for?” said Alice.
“Yes!” shouted Alice.
“You shan’t be beheaded!” said Alice, and she put them into a large
“_I_ see!” said the Queen, who had meanwhile been examining the roses.
“and then,” thought she, “what would become of me? They’re dreadfully































Alice could think of nothing else to say but “It belongs to the
Alice thought she might as well go back, and see how the game was going
Alice waited till the eyes appeared, and then nodded. “It’s no use
Alice was very glad to find her in such a pleasant temper, and thought
And the executioner went off like an arrow.
By the time she had caught the flamingo and brought it back, the fight
CHAPTER IX.
Duchess: you’d better ask _her_ about it.”
The Cat’s head began fading away the moment he was gone, and, by the
The King’s argument was, that anything that had a head could be
The Mock Turtle’s Story
The Queen had only one way of settling all difficulties, great or
The Queen smiled and passed on.
The Queen’s argument was, that if something wasn’t done about it in
The executioner’s argument was, that you couldn’t cut off a head unless
The hedgehog was engaged in a fight with another hedgehog, which seemed
The moment Alice appeared, she was appealed to by all three to settle
When she got back to the Cheshire Cat, she was surprised to find quite
a large crowd collected round it: there was a dispute going on between
all spoke at once, she found it very hard indeed to make out exactly
and they walked off together.
anxious.)
arch I’ve got to go through next walking about at the other end of the
beheaded, and that you weren’t to talk nonsense.
but I don’t remember where.”
complaining tone, “and they all quarrel so dreadfully one can’t hear
confusing it is all the things being alive; for instance, there’s the
down her flamingo, and began an account of the game, feeling very glad
escape again, and went back for a little more conversation with her
executed for having missed their turns, and she did not like the look
friend.
ground—and I should have croqueted the Queen’s hedgehog just now, only
have this cat removed!”
helpless sort of way to fly up into a tree.
hurried off.
introduce it.”
it ran away when it saw mine coming!”
kiss my hand if it likes.”
least, if there are, nobody attends to them—and you’ve no idea how
less than no time she’d have everybody executed, all round. (It was
looking at the Cat’s head with great curiosity.
matter much,” thought Alice, “as all the arches are gone from this side
of the ground.” So she tucked it away under her arm, that it might not
of them.” In another minute the whole head appeared, and then Alice put
of things at all, as the game was in such confusion that she never knew
on, as she heard the Queen’s voice in the distance, screaming with
oneself speak—and they don’t seem to have any rules in particular; at
other: the only difficulty was, that her flamingo was gone across to
passion. She had already heard her sentence three of the players to be
said the Duchess, as she tucked her arm affectionately into Alice’s,
savage when they met in the kitchen.
she had someone to listen to her. The Cat seemed to think that there
small. “Off with his head!” she said, without even looking round.
speaking to it,” she thought, “till its ears have come, or at least one
that the Queen was close behind her, listening: so she went on,
that!” He got behind Alice as he spoke.
the King and the executioner ran wildly up and down looking for it,
the Queen, who was passing at the moment, “My dear! I wish you would
the executioner, the King, and the Queen, who were all talking at once,
the other side of the garden, where Alice could see it trying in a
the question, and they repeated their arguments to her, though, as they
there was a body to cut it off from: that he had never had to do such a
thing before, and he wasn’t going to begin at _his_ time of life.
this last remark that had made the whole party look so grave and
time he had come back with the Duchess, it had entirely disappeared; so
to Alice an excellent opportunity for croqueting one of them with the
to herself that perhaps it was only the pepper that had made her so
was enough of it now in sight, and no more of it appeared.
was over, and both the hedgehogs were out of sight: “but it doesn’t
what they said.
whether it was her turn or not. So she went in search of her hedgehog.
while all the rest were quite silent, and looked very uncomfortable.
while the rest of the party went back to the game.
“A cat may look at a king,” said Alice. “I’ve read that in some book,
“Don’t be impertinent,” said the King, “and don’t look at me like
“How do you like the Queen?” said the Cat in a low voice.
“I don’t like the look of it at all,” said the King: “however, it may
“I don’t think they play at all fairly,” Alice began, in rather a
“It’s a friend of mine—a Cheshire Cat,” said Alice: “allow me to
“I’d rather not,” the Cat remarked.
“I’ll fetch the executioner myself,” said the King eagerly, and he
“Not at all,” said Alice: “she’s so extremely—” Just then she noticed
“She’s in prison,” the Queen said to the executioner: “fetch her here.”
“Well, it must be removed,” said the King very decidedly, and he called
“Who _are_ you talking to?” said the King, going up to Alice, and
“You can’t think how glad I am to see you again, you dear old thing!”
“—likely to win, that it’s hardly worth while finishing the game.”
































Alice did not much like keeping so close to her: first, because the
Alice.
And the moral of that is—‘The more there is of mine, the less there is
But here, to Alice’s great surprise, the Duchess’s voice died away,
Duchess was _very_ ugly; and secondly, because she was exactly the
Queen in front of them, with her arms folded, frowning like a
She had quite forgotten the Duchess by this time, and was a little
The Duchess took her choice, and was gone in a moment.
_that_ is—‘Take care of the sense, and the sounds will take care of
a bit.”
about half no time! Take your choice!”
about something, my dear, and that makes you forget to talk. I can’t
appear to others that what you were or might have been was not
birthday presents like that!” But she did not venture to say it out
bore it as well as she could.
does very well without—Maybe it’s always pepper that makes people
even in the middle of her favourite word ‘moral,’ and the arm that was
everything that Alice said; “there’s a large mustard-mine near here.
feel a little worried.
ground as she spoke; “either you or your head must be off, and that in
herself.
hot-tempered,” she went on, very much pleased at having found out a new
in a pleased tone.
is—‘Be what you would seem to be’—or if you’d like it put more
kind of rule, “and vinegar that makes them sour—and camomile that makes
linked into hers began to tremble. Alice looked up, and there stood the
little chin.
loud.
much frightened to say a word, but slowly followed her back to the
of everything I’ve said as yet.”
of yours.’”
otherwise than what you had been would have appeared to them to be
otherwise.’”
putting things!”
remark, “it’s a vegetable. It doesn’t look like one, but it is.”
right height to rest her chin upon Alice’s shoulder, and it was an
sharp little chin into Alice’s shoulder as she added, “and the moral of
she spoke.
simply—‘Never imagine yourself not to be otherwise than what it might
so stingy about it, you know—”
startled when she heard her voice close to her ear. “You’re thinking
sweet-tempered. I only wish people knew _that_: then they wouldn’t be
tell you just now what the moral of that is, but I shall remember it in
the Duchess said after a pause: “the reason is, that I’m doubtful about
the conversation a little.
the moral of that is—‘Birds of a feather flock together.’”
the m—”
the temper of your flamingo. Shall I try the experiment?”
their own business!”
them bitter—and—and barley-sugar and such things that make children
themselves.’”
thunderstorm.
to have the experiment tried.
tone though), “I won’t have any pepper in my kitchen _at all_. Soup
uncomfortably sharp chin. However, she did not like to be rude, so she
you can find it.” And she squeezed herself up closer to Alice’s side as
’tis love, that makes the world go round!’”
“A cheap sort of present!” thought Alice. “I’m glad they don’t give
“A fine day, your Majesty!” the Duchess began in a low, weak voice.
“Ah, well! It means much the same thing,” said the Duchess, digging her
“He might bite,” Alice cautiously replied, not feeling at all anxious
“How fond she is of finding morals in things!” Alice thought to
“I dare say you’re wondering why I don’t put my arm round your waist,”
“I quite agree with you,” said the Duchess; “and the moral of that
“I think I should understand that better,” Alice said very politely,
“It’s a mineral, I _think_,” said Alice.
“I’ve a right to think,” said Alice sharply, for she was beginning to
“Just about as much right,” said the Duchess, “as pigs have to fly; and
“Let’s go on with the game,” the Queen said to Alice; and Alice was too
“Now, I give you fair warning,” shouted the Queen, stamping on the
“Of course it is,” said the Duchess, who seemed ready to agree to
“Oh, I know!” exclaimed Alice, who had not attended to this last
“Oh, don’t talk about trouble!” said the Duchess. “I make you a present
“Only mustard isn’t a bird,” Alice remarked.
“Perhaps it hasn’t one,” Alice ventured to remark.
“Pray don’t trouble yourself to say it any longer than that,” said
“Right, as usual,” said the Duchess: “what a clear way you have of
“Somebody said,” Alice whispered, “that it’s done by everybody minding
“That’s nothing to what I could say if I chose,” the Duchess replied,
“The game’s going on rather better now,” she said, by way of keeping up
“Thinking again?” the Duchess asked, with another dig of her sharp
“Tut, tut, child!” said the Duchess. “Everything’s got a moral, if only
“Very true,” said the Duchess: “flamingoes and mustard both bite. And
“When _I’m_ a Duchess,” she said to herself, (not in a very hopeful
“if I had it written down: but I can’t quite follow it as you say it.”
“’Tis so,” said the Duchess: “and the moral of that is—‘Oh, ’tis love,


































All the time they were playing the Queen never left off quarrelling
As they walked off together, Alice heard the King say in a low voice,
But she waited patiently.
Gryphon answered, very nearly in the same words as before, “It’s all
Gryphon said to the Mock Turtle, “Drive on, old fellow! Don’t be all
So they sat down, and nobody spoke for some minutes. Alice thought to
So they went up to the Mock Turtle, who looked at them with large eyes
The Gryphon sat up and rubbed its eyes: then it watched the Queen till
The Mock Turtle went on.
The other guests had taken advantage of the Queen’s absence, and were
Then the Queen left off, quite out of breath, and said to Alice, “Have
These words were followed by a very long silence, broken only by an
They had not gone far before they saw the Mock Turtle in the distance,
They very soon came upon a Gryphon, lying fast asleep in the sun. (If
Turtle, and to hear his history. I must go back and see after some
Turtle.”
after it: “I never was so ordered about in all my life, never!”
all the players, except the King, the Queen, and Alice, were in custody
and under sentence of execution.
angrily: “really you are very dull!”
as to go after that savage Queen: so she waited.
at poor Alice, who felt ready to sink into the earth. At last the
back to the game, the Queen merely remarking that a moment’s delay
but on the whole she thought it would be quite as safe to stay with it
croquet-ground.
day about it!” and he went on in these words:
down, both of you, and don’t speak a word till I’ve finished.”
executes nobody, you know. Come on!”
executions I have ordered;” and she walked off, leaving Alice alone
full of tears, but said nothing.
good thing!” she said to herself, for she had felt quite unhappy at the
half to itself, half to Alice.
heavy sobbing of the Mock Turtle. Alice was very nearly getting up and
help thinking there _must_ be more to come, so she sat still and said
her head!” Those whom she sentenced were taken into custody by the
herself, “I don’t see how he can _ever_ finish, if he doesn’t begin.”
his fancy, that: he hasn’t got no sorrow, you know. Come on!”
history, she do.”
nearer, Alice could hear him sighing as if his heart would break. She
nothing.
number of executions the Queen had ordered.
occasional exclamation of “Hjckrrh!” from the Gryphon, and the constant
pitied him deeply. “What is his sorrow?” she asked the Gryphon, and the
proud as all that.”
question,” added the Gryphon; and then they both sat silent and looked
resting in the shade: however, the moment they saw her, they hurried
saying, “Thank you, sir, for your interesting story,” but she could not
sea. The master was an old Turtle—we used to call him Tortoise—”
she was out of sight: then it chuckled. “What fun!” said the Gryphon,
sitting sad and lonely on a little ledge of rock, and, as they came
soldiers, who of course had to leave off being arches to do this, so
that by the end of half an hour or so there were no arches left, and
thing!” said the Queen, “and take this young lady to see the Mock
though still sobbing a little now and then, “we went to school in the
to the company generally, “You are all pardoned.” “Come, _that’s_ a
with the Gryphon. Alice did not quite like the look of the creature,
with the other players, and shouting “Off with his head!” or “Off with
would cost them their lives.
you don’t know what a Gryphon is, look at the picture.) “Up, lazy
you seen the Mock Turtle yet?”
“And washing?” said the Mock Turtle.
“Certainly not!” said Alice indignantly.
“Come on, then,” said the Queen, “and he shall tell you his history,”
“Everybody says ‘come on!’ here,” thought Alice, as she went slowly
“Hold your tongue!” added the Gryphon, before Alice could speak again.
“I never said I didn’t!” interrupted Alice.
“I never saw one, or heard of one,” said Alice.
“It’s the thing Mock Turtle Soup is made from,” said the Queen.
“I’ll tell it her,” said the Mock Turtle in a deep, hollow tone: “sit
“No,” said Alice. “I don’t even know what a Mock Turtle is.”
“Once,” said the Mock Turtle at last, with a deep sigh, “I was a real
“This here young lady,” said the Gryphon, “she wants for to know your
“We called him Tortoise because he taught us,” said the Mock Turtle
“We had the best of educations—in fact, we went to school every day—”
“What _is_ the fun?” said Alice.
“When we were little,” the Mock Turtle went on at last, more calmly,
“Why did you call him Tortoise, if he wasn’t one?” Alice asked.
“Why, _she_,” said the Gryphon. “It’s all her fancy, that: they never
“With extras?” asked the Mock Turtle a little anxiously.
“Yes, we went to school in the sea, though you mayn’t believe it—”
“Yes,” said Alice, “we learned French and music.”
“You did,” said the Mock Turtle.
“You ought to be ashamed of yourself for asking such a simple
“_I’ve_ been to a day-school, too,” said Alice; “you needn’t be so












































(Alice began to say “I once tasted—” but checked herself hastily, and
Alice did not feel encouraged to ask any more questions about it, so
Alice)—“and perhaps you were never even introduced to a lobster—”
CHAPTER X.
Distraction, Uglification, and Derision.”
Fainting in Coils.”
Laughing and Grief, they used to say.”
Lobster Quadrille is!”
Seaography: then Drawling—the Drawling-master was an old conger-eel,
The Gryphon lifted up both its paws in surprise. “What! Never heard of
The Lobster Quadrille
The Mock Turtle sighed deeply, and drew the back of one flapper across
This was quite a new idea to Alice, and she thought it over a little
a holiday?”
before she made her next remark. “Then the eleventh day must have been
creatures hid their faces in their paws.
decided tone: “tell her something about the games now.”
his eyes. He looked at Alice, and tried to speak, but for a minute or
is, you _are_ a simpleton.”
of the sea.”
on.”
only took the regular course.”
replied; “and then the different branches of Arithmetic—Ambition,
running down his cheeks, he went on again:—
said the Gryphon: and it set to work shaking him and punching him in
said “No, never”) “—so you can have no idea what a delightful thing a
sea-shore—”
she turned to the Mock Turtle, and said “What else had you to learn?”
stiff. And the Gryphon never learnt it.”
subjects on his flappers, “—Mystery, ancient and modern, with
that used to come once a week: _he_ taught us Drawling, Stretching, and
the back. At last the Mock Turtle recovered his voice, and, with tears
then, when you’ve cleared all the jelly-fish out of the way—”
though. He was an old crab, _he_ was.”
to change the subject.
tone of great relief. “Now at _ours_ they had at the end of the bill,
two sobs choked his voice. “Same as if he had a bone in his throat,”
uglifying!” it exclaimed. “You know what to beautify is, I suppose?”
‘French, music, _and washing_—extra.’”
“Ah! then yours wasn’t a really good school,” said the Mock Turtle in a
“And how did you manage on the twelfth?” Alice went on eagerly.
“And how many hours a day did you do lessons?” said Alice, in a hurry
“Each with a lobster as a partner!” cried the Gryphon.
“Hadn’t time,” said the Gryphon: “I went to the Classics master,
“I couldn’t afford to learn it.” said the Mock Turtle with a sigh. “I
“I never heard of ‘Uglification,’” Alice ventured to say. “What is it?”
“I never went to him,” the Mock Turtle said with a sigh: “he taught
“No, indeed,” said Alice. “What sort of a dance is it?”
“Of course it was,” said the Mock Turtle.
“Of course,” the Mock Turtle said: “advance twice, set to partners—”
“Reeling and Writhing, of course, to begin with,” the Mock Turtle
“So he did, so he did,” said the Gryphon, sighing in his turn; and both
“Swim after them!” screamed the Gryphon.
“Ten hours the first day,” said the Mock Turtle: “nine the next, and so
“That’s enough about lessons,” the Gryphon interrupted in a very
“That’s the reason they’re called lessons,” the Gryphon remarked:
“The lobsters!” shouted the Gryphon, with a bound into the air.
“Then, you know,” the Mock Turtle went on, “you throw the—”
“Two lines!” cried the Mock Turtle. “Seals, turtles, salmon, and so on;
“Well, I can’t show it you myself,” the Mock Turtle said: “I’m too
“Well, then,” the Gryphon went on, “if you don’t know what to uglify
“Well, there was Mystery,” the Mock Turtle replied, counting off the
“What a curious plan!” exclaimed Alice.
“What was _that_ like?” said Alice.
“What was that?” inquired Alice.
“Why,” said the Gryphon, “you first form into a line along the
“Yes,” said Alice doubtfully: “it means—to—make—anything—prettier.”
“You couldn’t have wanted it much,” said Alice; “living at the bottom
“You may not have lived much under the sea—” (“I haven’t,” said
“_That_ generally takes some time,” interrupted the Gryphon.
“because they lessen from day to day.”
“—as far out to sea as you can—”
“—change lobsters, and retire in same order,” continued the Gryphon.
“—you advance twice—”




































Alice looked down at them, and considered a little before she gave her
Alice was thoroughly puzzled. “Does the boots and shoes!” she repeated
But the snail replied “Too far, too far!” and gave a look askance—
Gryphon. “We can do without lobsters, you know. Which shall sing?”
Said he thanked the whiting kindly, but he would not join the dance.
See how eagerly the lobsters and the turtles all advance!
So they began solemnly dancing round and round Alice, every now and
The further off from England the nearer is to France—
Then turn not pale, beloved snail, but come and join the dance.
They are waiting on the shingle—will you come and join the dance?
Turtle, suddenly dropping his voice; and the two creatures, who had
When they take us up and throw us, with the lobsters, out to sea!”
Will you, won’t you, will you, won’t you, will you join the dance?
Will you, won’t you, will you, won’t you, will you join the dance?
Will you, won’t you, will you, won’t you, won’t you join the dance?
Will you, won’t you, will you, won’t you, won’t you join the dance?”
Would not, could not, would not, could not, could not join the dance.
Would not, could not, would not, could not, would not join the dance.
about a whiting before.”
about.
all wash off in the sea. But they _have_ their tails in their mouths;
and sadly:—
and the reason is—” here the Mock Turtle yawned and shut his
and told me he was going a journey, I should say ‘With what porpoise?’”
answer. “They’re done with blacking, I believe.”
been jumping about like mad things all this time, sat down again very
couldn’t get them out again. That’s all.”
curious song about the whiting!”
eyes.—“Tell her about the reason and all that,” he said to the Gryphon.
fall a long way. So they got their tails fast in their mouths. So they
feeling very glad that it was over at last: “and I do so like that
forepaws to mark the time, while the Mock Turtle sang this, very slowly
hastily.
in a wondering tone.
know why it’s called a whiting?”
lobsters to the dance. So they got thrown out to sea. So they had to
makes them so shiny?”
of course?”
please: we don’t want _you_ with us!’”
running on the song, “I’d have said to the porpoise, ‘Keep back,
sadly and quietly, and looked at Alice.
seen them so often, of course you know what they’re like.”
the Gryphon added “Come, let’s hear some of _your_ adventures.”
their mouths—and they’re all over crumbs.”
then treading on her toes when they passed too close, and waving their
wise fish would go anywhere without a porpoise.”
“And what are they made of?” Alice asked in a tone of great curiosity.
“Back to land again, and that’s all the first figure,” said the Mock
“Boots and shoes under the sea,” the Gryphon went on in a deep voice,
“Change lobsters again!” yelled the Gryphon at the top of its voice.
“Come, let’s try the first figure!” said the Mock Turtle to the
“Don’t you mean ‘purpose’?” said Alice.
“I believe so,” Alice replied thoughtfully. “They have their tails in
“I can tell you more than that, if you like,” said the Gryphon. “Do you
“I don’t know where Dinn may be,” said the Mock Turtle, “but if you’ve
“I mean what I say,” the Mock Turtle replied in an offended tone. And
“I never thought about it,” said Alice. “Why?”
“If I’d been the whiting,” said Alice, whose thoughts were still
“It must be a very pretty dance,” said Alice timidly.
“Of course not,” said the Mock Turtle: “why, if a fish came to _me_,
“Oh, _you_ sing,” said the Gryphon. “I’ve forgotten the words.”
“Oh, as to the whiting,” said the Mock Turtle, “they—you’ve seen them,
“Soles and eels, of course,” the Gryphon replied rather impatiently:
“Thank you, it’s a very interesting dance to watch,” said Alice,
“Thank you,” said Alice, “it’s very interesting. I never knew so much
“The reason is,” said the Gryphon, “that they _would_ go with the
“There is another shore, you know, upon the other side.
“There’s a porpoise close behind us, and he’s treading on my tail.
“They were obliged to have him with them,” the Mock Turtle said: “no
“Turn a somersault in the sea!” cried the Mock Turtle, capering wildly
“Very much indeed,” said Alice.
“What matters it how far we go?” his scaly friend replied.
“Why, what are _your_ shoes done with?” said the Gryphon. “I mean, what
“Will you walk a little faster?” said a whiting to a snail.
“Would you like to see a little of it?” said the Mock Turtle.
“Wouldn’t it really?” said Alice in a tone of great surprise.
“Yes,” said Alice, “I’ve often seen them at dinn—” she checked herself
“You can really have no notion how delightful it will be
“You’re wrong about the crumbs,” said the Mock Turtle: “crumbs would
“_It does the boots and shoes_,” the Gryphon replied very solemnly.
“any shrimp could have told you that.”
“are done with a whiting. Now you know.”





























    Beautiful, beautiful Soup!
    Beau—ootiful Soo—oop!
    Beau—ootiful Soo—oop!
    Beau—ootiful Soo—oop!
Alice a little timidly: “but it’s no use going back to yesterday,
Alice did not dare to disobey, though she felt sure it would all come
Alice said nothing; she had sat down with her face in her hands,
And concluded the banquet—]
And will talk in contemptuous tones of the Shark,
As a duck with its eyelids, so he with his nose
But, when the tide rises and sharks are around,
Caterpillar, and the words all coming different, and then the Mock
Game, or any other dish?
Gryphon.
His voice has a timid and tremulous sound.]
How the Owl and the Panther were sharing a pie—”
Pennyworth only of beautiful Soup?
Quadrille, that she hardly knew what she was saying, and the words came
So Alice began telling them her adventures from the time when she first
Soo—oop of the e—e—evening,
Soup of the evening, beautiful Soup!
Soup of the evening, beautiful Soup!
The Mock Turtle sighed deeply, and began, in a voice sometimes choked
The Panther took pie-crust, and gravy, and meat,
Trims his belt and his buttons, and turns out his toes.”
Turtle drew a long breath, and said “That’s very curious.”
Waiting in a hot tureen!
Was kindly permitted to pocket the spoon:
When the pie was all finished, the Owl, as a boon,
When the sands are all dry, he is gay as a lark,
While the Owl had the dish as its share of the treat.
While the Panther received knife and fork with a growl,
Who for such dainties would not stoop?
Who would not give all else for two p
[later editions continued as follows
[later editions continued as follows
about her repeating “_You are old, Father William_,” to the
authority over Alice.
because I was a different person then.”
begin.” He looked at the Gryphon as if he thought it had some kind of
begins ‘_I passed by his garden_.’”
ennyworth only of beautiful Soup?
fellow?”
interrupted, “if you don’t explain it as you go on? It’s by far the
most confusing thing _I_ ever heard!”
only too glad to do so.
puzzled by the whole thing, and longed to change the subject.
replied, so eagerly that the Gryphon said, in a rather offended tone,
saw the White Rabbit. She was a little nervous about it just at first,
should like to hear her try and repeat something now. Tell her to
the Gryphon.
the two creatures got so close to her, one on each side, and opened
their eyes and mouths so _very_ wide, but she gained courage as she
them out with his nose, you know?”
thought Alice; “I might as well be at school at once.” However, she got
uncommon nonsense.”
up, and began to repeat it, but her head was so full of the Lobster
verse.”
very queer indeed:—
went on. Her listeners were perfectly quiet till she got to the part
went on. “Or would you like the Mock Turtle to sing you a song?”
with sobs, to sing this:—
wondering if anything would _ever_ happen in a natural way again.
wrong, and she went on in a trembling voice:—
“Beautiful Soup! Who cares for fish,
“Beautiful Soup, so rich and green,
“But about his toes?” the Mock Turtle persisted. “How _could_ he turn
“Explain all that,” said the Mock Turtle.
“Go on with the next verse,” the Gryphon repeated impatiently: “it
“Hm! No accounting for tastes! Sing her ‘_Turtle Soup_,’ will you, old
“How the creatures order one about, and make one repeat lessons!”
“I could tell you my adventures—beginning from this morning,” said
“I passed by his garden, and marked, with one eye,
“I should like to have it explained,” said the Mock Turtle.
“It all came different!” the Mock Turtle repeated thoughtfully. “I
“It’s all about as curious as it can be,” said the Gryphon.
“It’s the first position in dancing.” Alice said; but was dreadfully
“No, no! The adventures first,” said the Gryphon in an impatient tone:
“Oh, a song, please, if the Mock Turtle would be so kind,” Alice
“Shall we try another figure of the Lobster Quadrille?” the Gryphon
“She can’t explain it,” said the Gryphon hastily. “Go on with the next
“Stand up and repeat ‘’_Tis the voice of the sluggard_,’” said the
“That’s different from what _I_ used to say when I was a child,” said
“Well, I never heard it before,” said the Mock Turtle; “but it sounds
“What _is_ the use of repeating all that stuff,” the Mock Turtle
“Yes, I think you’d better leave off,” said the Gryphon: and Alice was
“You have baked me too brown, I must sugar my hair.”
“explanations take such a dreadful time.”
“’Tis the voice of the Lobster; I heard him declare,
































    All on a summer day:
    And took them quite away!”
    Beautiful, beautiful Soup!”
    Beautiful, beauti—FUL SOUP!”
    Beau—ootiful Soo—oop!
(she was obliged to say “creatures,” you see, because some of them were
Alice could see, as well as if she were looking over their shoulders,
Alice had never been in a court of justice before, but she had read
But there seemed to be no chance of this, so she began looking at
CHAPTER XI.
Majesty,” he began, “for bringing these in: but I hadn’t quite finished
On this the White Rabbit blew three blasts on the trumpet, and then
One of the jurors had a pencil that squeaked. This of course, Alice
Soo—oop of the e—e—evening,
The Hatter looked at the March Hare, who had followed him into the
The King and Queen of Hearts were seated on their throne when they
The Knave of Hearts, he stole those tarts,
The first witness was the Hatter. He came in with a teacup in one hand
The judge, by the way, was the King; and as he wore his crown over the
The twelve jurors were all writing very busily on slates. “What are
Who Stole the Tarts?
about them in books, and she was quite pleased to find that she knew
and a piece of bread-and-butter in the other. “I beg pardon, your
and she could even make out that one of them didn’t know how to spell
animals, and some were birds,) “I suppose they are the jurors.” She
answered “Come on!” and ran the faster, while more and more faintly
arrived, with a great crowd assembled about them—all sorts of little
at all what had become of it; so, after hunting all about for it, he
birds and beasts, as well as the whole pack of cards: the Knave was
came, carried on the breeze that followed them, the melancholy words:—
could _not_ stand, and she went round the court and got behind him, and
court was a table, with a large dish of tarts upon it: they looked so
court!” and the King put on his spectacles and looked anxiously round,
court, arm-in-arm with the Dormouse. “Fourteenth of March, I _think_ it
deal to come before that!”
did not look at all comfortable, and it was certainly not becoming.
distance.
everything about her, to pass away the time.
get the trial done,” she thought, “and hand round the refreshments!”
girls of her age knew the meaning of it at all. However, “jury-men”
good, that it made Alice quite hungry to look at them—“I wish they’d
hand, and a scroll of parchment in the other. In the very middle of the
herself, “because of his great wig.”
him; and near the King was the White Rabbit, with a trumpet in one
muddle their slates’ll be in before the trial’s over!” thought Alice.
my tea when I was sent for.”
off, without waiting for the end of the song.
proud of it: for she thought, and rightly too, that very few little
reduced the answer to shillings and pence.
said this last word two or three times over to herself, being rather
standing before them, in chains, with a soldier on each side to guard
stopped hastily, for the White Rabbit cried out, “Silence in the
that all the jurors were writing down “stupid things!” on their slates,
that the poor little juror (it was Bill, the Lizard) could not make out
the name of nearly everything there. “That’s the judge,” she said to
they doing?” Alice whispered to the Gryphon. “They can’t have anything
three blasts on the trumpet, and called out, “First witness!”
to make out who was talking.
to put down yet, before the trial’s begun.”
to repeat it, when a cry of “The trial’s beginning!” was heard in the
unrolled the parchment scroll, and read as follows:—
very soon found an opportunity of taking it away. She did it so quickly
was obliged to write with one finger for the rest of the day; and this
was of very little use, as it left no mark on the slate.
was,” he said.
wig, (look at the frontispiece if you want to see how he did it,) he
would have done just as well.
wrote down all three dates on their slates, and then added them up, and
“And that’s the jury-box,” thought Alice, “and those twelve creatures,”
“Call the first witness,” said the King; and the White Rabbit blew
“Chorus again!” cried the Gryphon, and the Mock Turtle had just begun
“Come on!” cried the Gryphon, and, taking Alice by the hand, it hurried
“Consider your verdict,” the King said to the jury.
“Fifteenth,” said the March Hare.
“Herald, read the accusation!” said the King.
“Not yet, not yet!” the Rabbit hastily interrupted. “There’s a great
“Sixteenth,” added the Dormouse.
“Soo—oop of the e—e—evening,
“Stupid things!” Alice began in a loud, indignant voice, but she
“The Queen of Hearts, she made some tarts,
“They’re putting down their names,” the Gryphon whispered in reply,
“What trial is it?” Alice panted as she ran; but the Gryphon only
“Write that down,” the King said to the jury, and the jury eagerly
“You ought to have finished,” said the King. “When did you begin?”
“for fear they should forget them before the end of the trial.”
“stupid,” and that he had to ask his neighbour to tell him. “A nice








































All this time the Queen had never left off staring at the Hatter, and,
Here one of the guinea-pigs cheered, and was immediately suppressed by
Here the Queen put on her spectacles, and began staring at the Hatter,
Here the other guinea-pig cheered, and was suppressed.
Just at this moment Alice felt a very curious sensation, which puzzled
King.
The miserable Hatter dropped his teacup and bread-and-butter, and went
This did not seem to encourage the witness at all: he kept shifting
a memorandum of the fact.
anxiously round to see if he would deny it too: but the Dormouse denied
applause, which was immediately suppressed by the officers of the
as long as there was room for her.
bread-and-butter getting so thin—and the twinkling of the tea—”
bread-and-butter.
confusion he bit a large piece out of his teacup instead of the
court,” and I never understood what it meant till now.”
down on one knee. “I’m a poor man, your Majesty,” he began.
executed, whether you’re nervous or not.”
explain to you how it was done. They had a large canvas bag, which tied
from one foot to the other, looking uneasily at the Queen, and in his
grow larger again, and she thought at first she would get up and leave
have you executed on the spot.”
head first, and then sat upon it.)
her a good deal until she made out what it was: she was beginning to
just as the Dormouse crossed the court, she said to one of the officers
next to her. “I can hardly breathe.”
nothing, being fast asleep.
of my own. I’m a hatter.”
of the court, “Bring me the list of the singers in the last concert!”
off.
on better.”
on which the wretched Hatter trembled so, that he shook both his shoes
take me for a dunce? Go on!”
that ridiculous fashion.” And he got up very sulkily and crossed over
that—only the March Hare said—”
the Queen, who was reading the list of singers.
the court; but on second thoughts she decided to remain where she was
the newspapers, at the end of trials, “There was some attempts at
the officers of the court. (As that is rather a hard word, I will just
to the other side of the court.
too.”
up at the mouth with strings: into this they slipped the guinea-pig,
who turned pale and fidgeted.
without even waiting to put his shoes on.
“After that,” continued the Hatter, “I cut some more bread-and-butter—”
“But what did the Dormouse say?” one of the jury asked.
“Come, that finished the guinea-pigs!” thought Alice. “Now we shall get
“Don’t talk nonsense,” said Alice more boldly: “you know you’re growing
“Give your evidence,” said the King; “and don’t be nervous, or I’ll
“Give your evidence,” the King repeated angrily, “or I’ll have you
“He denies it,” said the King: “leave out that part.”
“I can’t go no lower,” said the Hatter: “I’m on the floor, as it is.”
“I can’t help it,” said Alice very meekly: “I’m growing.”
“I deny it!” said the March Hare.
“I didn’t!” the March Hare interrupted in a great hurry.
“I keep them to sell,” the Hatter added as an explanation; “I’ve none
“I wish you wouldn’t squeeze so.” said the Dormouse, who was sitting
“If that’s all you know about it, you may stand down,” continued the
“It _began_ with the tea,” the Hatter replied.
“It isn’t mine,” said the Hatter.
“I’d rather finish my tea,” said the Hatter, with an anxious look at
“I’m a poor man, your Majesty,” the Hatter began, in a trembling voice,
“I’m a poor man,” the Hatter went on, “and most things twinkled after
“I’m glad I’ve seen that done,” thought Alice. “I’ve so often read in
“Of course twinkling begins with a T!” said the King sharply. “Do you
“Take off your hat,” the King said to the Hatter.
“That I can’t remember,” said the Hatter.
“The twinkling of the _what?_” said the King.
“Then you may _sit_ down,” the King replied.
“Well, at any rate, the Dormouse said—” the Hatter went on, looking
“Yes, but _I_ grow at a reasonable pace,” said the Dormouse: “not in
“You _must_ remember,” remarked the King, “or I’ll have you executed.”
“You did!” said the Hatter.
“You may go,” said the King, and the Hatter hurriedly left the court,
“You’re a _very_ poor _speaker_,” said the King.
“You’ve no right to grow _here_,” said the Dormouse.
“_Stolen!_” the King exclaimed, turning to the jury, who instantly made
“—and I hadn’t begun my tea—not above a week or so—and what with the




































Alice could see this, as she was near enough to look over their slates;
Alice looked at the jury-box, and saw that, in her haste, she had put
Alice watched the White Rabbit as he fumbled over the list, feeling
Alice’s Evidence
As soon as the jury had a little recovered from the shock of being
At this moment the King, who had been for some time busily writing in
CHAPTER XII.
Everybody looked at Alice.
For some minutes the whole court was in confusion, getting the Dormouse
Forty-two. _All persons more than a mile high to leave the court_.”
Rabbit interrupted: “_Un_important, your Majesty means, of course,” he
Some of the jury wrote it down “important,” and some “unimportant.”
The King looked anxiously at the White Rabbit, who said in a low voice,
The next witness was the Duchess’s cook. She carried the pepper-box in
Turn that Dormouse out of court! Suppress him! Pinch him! Off with his
a hurry that she tipped over the jury-box with the edge of her skirt,
accident, all except the Lizard, who seemed too much overcome to do
after folding his arms and frowning at the cook till his eyes were
all the jurymen are back in their proper places—_all_,” he repeated
anything but sit with its mouth open, gazing up into the roof of the
began picking them up again as quickly as she could, for the accident
court, by the way the people near the door began sneezing all at once.
court.
dear, _you_ must cross-examine the next witness. It quite makes my
disappeared.
forehead ache!”
goldfish she had accidentally upset the week before.
got it out again, and put it right; “not that it signifies much,” she
haven’t got much evidence _yet_,” she said to herself. Imagine her
he spoke.
her hand, and Alice guessed who it was, even before she got into the
his note-book, cackled out “Silence!” and read out from his book, “Rule
idea that they must be collected at once and put back into the
jury-box, or they would die.
just beginning to write this down on their slates, when the White
large she had grown in the last few minutes, and she jumped up in such
little voice, the name “Alice!”
nearly out of sight, he said in a deep voice, “What are tarts made of?”
next witness.” And he added in an undertone to the Queen, “Really, my
of the goldfish kept running in her head, and she had a vague sort of
officers: but the Hatter was out of sight before the officer could get
said in a very respectful tone, but frowning and making faces at him as
said to herself; “I should think it would be _quite_ as much use in the
surprise, when the White Rabbit read out, at the top of his shrill
tail about in a melancholy way, being quite unable to move. She soon
the Lizard in head downwards, and the poor little thing was waving its
them, they set to work very diligently to write out a history of the
they lay sprawling about, reminding her very much of a globe of
to himself in an undertone,
to the door.
trial one way up as the other.”
turned out, and, by the time they had settled down again, the cook had
upset, and their slates and pencils had been found and handed back to
upsetting all the jurymen on to the heads of the crowd below, and there
very curious to see what the next witness would be like, “—for they
which word sounded best.
whiskers!”
with great emphasis, looking hard at Alice as he said so.
“Call the next witness!” said the King.
“Collar that Dormouse,” the Queen shrieked out. “Behead that Dormouse!
“Give your evidence,” said the King.
“Here!” cried Alice, quite forgetting in the flurry of the moment how
“Nearly two miles high,” added the Queen.
“Never mind!” said the King, with an air of great relief. “Call the
“Nothing _whatever?_” persisted the King.
“Nothing whatever,” said Alice.
“Nothing,” said Alice.
“Oh, I _beg_ your pardon!” she exclaimed in a tone of great dismay, and
“Pepper, mostly,” said the cook.
“Shan’t,” said the cook.
“That’s very important,” the King said, turning to the jury. They were
“The trial cannot proceed,” said the King in a very grave voice, “until
“Treacle,” said a sleepy voice behind her.
“Well, if I must, I must,” the King said, with a melancholy air, and,
“What do you know about this business?” the King said to Alice.
“You are,” said the King.
“Your Majesty must cross-examine _this_ witness.”
“_I’m_ not a mile high,” said Alice.
“_Un_important, of course, I meant,” the King hastily said, and went on
“but it doesn’t matter a bit,” she thought to herself.
“important—unimportant—unimportant—important—” as if he were trying
“—and just take his head off outside,” the Queen added to one of the



































    (Before she had this fit)
    (We know it to be true):
    And mentioned me to him:
    Between yourself and me.”
    But said I could not swim.
    Exactly as we were.
    For this must ever be
    Him, and ourselves, and it.
    Involved in this affair,
    Though they were mine before.
    What would become of you?
    You gave us three or more;
A secret, kept from all the rest,
An obstacle that came between
Don’t let him know she liked them best,
He sent them word I had not gone
He trusts to you to set them free,
I gave her one, they gave him two,
If I or she should chance to be
If she should push the matter on,
King, rubbing his hands; “so now let the jury—”
My notion was that you had been
She gave me a good character,
The King turned pale, and shut his note-book hastily. “Consider your
The Knave shook his head sadly. “Do I look like it?” he said. (Which he
The White Rabbit put on his spectacles. “Where shall I begin, please
The jury all wrote down on their slates, “_She_ doesn’t believe there’s
There was a general clapping of hands at this: it was the first really
These were the verses the White Rabbit read:—
They all returned from him to you,
White Rabbit, jumping up in a great hurry; “this paper has just been
all brightened up again.)
an atom of meaning in it,” but none of them attempted to explain the
an atom of meaning in it.”
and added “It isn’t a letter, after all: it’s a set of verses.”
can’t prove I did: there’s no name signed at the end.”
certainly did _not_, being made entirely of cardboard.)
clever thing the King had said that day.
come to the end: then stop.”
course—‘_I gave her one, they gave him two_—’ why, that must be what he
interrupting him,) “I’ll give him sixpence. _I_ don’t believe there’s
know,” he went on, spreading out the verses on his knee, and looking at
large in the last few minutes that she wasn’t a bit afraid of
letter, written by the prisoner to—to somebody.”
nobody, which isn’t usual, you know.”
nothing written on the _outside_.” He unfolded the paper as he spoke,
paper.
picked up.”
regular rule: you invented it just now.”
them with one eye; “I seem to see some meaning in them, after all.
thing about it.” (The jury all looked puzzled.)
to the Knave.
trouble, you know, as we needn’t try to find any. And yet I don’t
verdict,” he said to the jury, in a low, trembling voice.
verses to himself: “‘_We know it to be true_—’ that’s the jury, of
what they’re about!”
worse. You _must_ have meant some mischief, or else you’d have signed
your Majesty?” he asked.
your name like an honest man.”
“All right, so far,” said the King, and he went on muttering over the
“Are they in the prisoner’s handwriting?” asked another of the jurymen.
“Begin at the beginning,” the King said gravely, “and go on till you
“He must have imitated somebody else’s hand,” said the King. (The jury
“I haven’t opened it yet,” said the White Rabbit, “but it seems to be a
“If any one of them can explain it,” said Alice, (she had grown so
“If there’s no meaning in it,” said the King, “that saves a world of
“If you didn’t sign it,” said the King, “that only makes the matter
“It isn’t directed at all,” said the White Rabbit; “in fact, there’s
“It must have been that,” said the King, “unless it was written to
“It proves nothing of the sort!” said Alice. “Why, you don’t even know
“It’s the oldest rule in the book,” said the King.
“No, they’re not,” said the White Rabbit, “and that’s the queerest
“Please your Majesty,” said the Knave, “I didn’t write it, and they
“Read them,” said the King.
“That _proves_ his guilt,” said the Queen.
“That’s the most important piece of evidence we’ve heard yet,” said the
“Then it ought to be Number One,” said Alice.
“There’s more evidence to come yet, please your Majesty,” said the
“They told me you had been to her,
“Well, I shan’t go, at any rate,” said Alice: “besides, that’s not a
“What’s in it?” said the Queen.
“Who is it directed to?” said one of the jurymen.
“—_said I could not swim_—” you can’t swim, can you?” he added, turning




























    https://www.gutenberg.org/1/11/
(she knew) to the confused clamour of the busy farm-yard—while the
*** END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK ALICE’S ADVENTURES IN WONDERLAND ***
***** This file should be named 11-0.txt or 11-0.zip *****
Adventures of hers that you have just been reading about; and when she
At this the whole pack rose up into the air, and came flying down upon
But her sister sat still just as she left her, leaning her head on her
Creating the works from print editions not protected by U.S. copyright
First, she dreamed of little Alice herself, and once again the tiny
Lastly, she pictured to herself how this same little sister of hers
Lizard’s slate-pencil, and the choking of the suppressed guinea-pigs,
So Alice got up and ran off, thinking while she ran, as well she might,
So she sat on, with closed eyes, and half believed herself in
THE END 
The long grass rustled at her feet as the White Rabbit hurried by—the
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
Turtle.
Turtle’s heavy sobs.
United States without permission and without paying copyright
Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions will
Wonderland, though she knew she had but to open them again, and all
about the twentieth time that day.
again—‘_before she had this fit_—’ you never had fits, my dear, I
and make _their_ eyes bright and eager with many a strange tale,
and this was her dream:—
around it—once more the shriek of the Gryphon, the squeaking of the
as it lasted.)
as she spoke. (The unfortunate little Bill had left off writing on his
be renamed.
began again, using the ink, that was trickling down his face, as long
childhood: and how she would gather about her other little children,
could hear the rattle of the teacups as the March Hare and his friends
court with a smile. There was a dead silence.
cries to the voice of the shepherd boy—and the sneeze of the baby, the
days.
did with the tarts, you know—”
dream, dear, certainly: but now run in to your tea; it’s getting late.”
filled the air, mixed up with the distant sobs of the miserable Mock
frightened Mouse splashed his way through the neighbouring pool—she
had finished, her sister kissed her, and said, “It _was_ a curious
had!”
hand, watching the setting sun, and thinking of little Alice and all
hands were clasped upon her knee, and the bright eager eyes were
head in the lap of her sister, who was gently brushing away some dead
her wonderful Adventures, till she too began dreaming after a fashion,
her: she gave a little scream, half of fright and half of anger, and
keep, through all her riper years, the simple and loving heart of her
laughed, “Let the jury consider their verdict,” the King said, for
law means that no one owns a United States copyright in these works,
leaves that had fluttered down from the trees upon her face.
looking up into hers—she could hear the very tones of her voice, and
lowing of the cattle in the distance would take the place of the Mock
moved.
ordering off her unfortunate guests to execution—once more the pig-baby
perhaps even with the dream of Wonderland of long ago: and how she
see that queer little toss of her head to keep back the wandering hair
seemed to listen, the whole place around her became alive with the
sentence first!”
shared their never-ending meal, and the shrill voice of the Queen
shriek of the Gryphon, and all the other queer noises, would change
sister, as well as she could remember them, all these strange
slate with one finger, as he found it made no mark; but he now hastily
so the Foundation (and you!) can copy and distribute it in the
strange creatures of her little sister’s dream.
tarts on the table. “Nothing can be clearer than _that_. Then
teacups would change to tinkling sheep-bells, and the Queen’s shrill
that _would_ always get into her eyes—and still as she listened, or
their simple joys, remembering her own child-life, and the happy summer
think?” he said to the Queen.
this time.) “You’re nothing but a pack of cards!”
tried to beat them off, and found herself lying on the bank, with her
was sneezing on the Duchess’s knee, while plates and dishes crashed
what a wonderful dream it had been.
wind, and the pool rippling to the waving of the reeds—the rattling
would change to dull reality—the grass would be only rustling in the
would feel with all their simple sorrows, and find a pleasure in all
would, in the after-time, be herself a grown woman; and how she would
“But, it goes on ‘_they all returned from him to you_,’” said Alice.
“Hold your tongue!” said the Queen, turning purple.
“I won’t!” said Alice.
“It’s a pun!” the King added in an offended tone, and everybody
“Never!” said the Queen furiously, throwing an inkstand at the Lizard
“No, no!” said the Queen. “Sentence first—verdict afterwards.”
“Off with her head!” the Queen shouted at the top of her voice. Nobody
“Oh, I’ve had such a curious dream!” said Alice, and she told her
“Stuff and nonsense!” said Alice loudly. “The idea of having the
“Then the words don’t _fit_ you,” said the King, looking round the
“Wake up, Alice dear!” said her sister; “Why, what a long sleep you’ve
“Who cares for you?” said Alice, (she had grown to her full size by
“Why, there they are!” said the King triumphantly, pointing to the














  This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
  United States, you will have to check the laws of the country where
  eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the
  most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no
  restrictions whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it
  under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included with this
  you are located before using this eBook.
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
(trademark/copyright) agreement. If you do not agree to abide by all
1.A. By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
1.B. "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark. It may only be
1.C. The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the
1.D. The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
1.E. Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:
1.E.1. The following sentence, with active links to, or other
1.E.2. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is
1.E.3. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
1.E.4. Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
1.E.8.
Foundation" or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection
Gutenberg eBooks may be modified and printed and given away--you may
Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the work, you must comply
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full
Gutenberg-tm electronic works
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this
Gutenberg-tm electronic works to protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK
Project Gutenberg-tm License available with this file or online at
Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound
Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with the work. You can easily
START: FULL LICENSE
Section 1. General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project
States. If an individual work is unprotected by copyright law in the
THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
United States and you are located in the United States, we do not
additional terms imposed by the copyright holder. Additional terms
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement. There are a few
agreement and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm
agreement before downloading, copying, displaying, performing,
all references to Project Gutenberg are removed. Of course, we hope
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
and may not be used if you charge for an eBook, except by following
beginning of this work.
by U.S. copyright law. Redistribution is subject to the trademark
by the terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the
check the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this
claim a right to prevent you from copying, distributing, performing,
comply with the terms of this agreement by keeping this work in the
concept and trademark. Project Gutenberg is a registered trademark,
contain a notice indicating that it is posted with permission of the
copies of this eBook, complying with the trademark license is very
copyright holder), the work can be copied and distributed to anyone in
country other than the United States.
derived from texts not protected by U.S. copyright law (does not
destroy all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your
displaying or creating derivative works based on the work as long as
distributing or creating derivative works based on this work or any
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
do practically ANYTHING in the United States with eBooks not protected
easy. You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose such as creation
either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 or
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
electronic works. See paragraph 1.E below.
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement. See
free access to electronic works by freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm
immediate access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear
in a constant state of change. If you are outside the United States,
license, especially commercial redistribution.
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any
obtain permission for the use of the work and the Project Gutenberg-tm
of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works. Nearly all the individual
of derivative works, reports, performances and research. Project
of the Project Gutenberg trademark. If you do not charge anything for
of this license, apply to copying and distributing Project
on which the phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the
other Project Gutenberg-tm work. The Foundation makes no
paragraph 1.C below. There are a lot of things you can do with Project
performed, viewed, copied or distributed:
person or entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph
phrase "Project Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed,
possession. If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a
posted with the permission of the copyright holder found at the
prominently whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work
redistributing or providing access to a work with the phrase "Project
representations concerning the copyright status of any work in any
royalties. Special rules, set forth in the General Terms of Use part
same format with its attached full Project Gutenberg-tm License when
that you will support the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting
the United States without paying any fees or charges. If you are
the terms of the trademark license, including paying royalties for use
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
what you can do with this work. Copyright laws in most countries are
will be linked to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.
works in compliance with the terms of this agreement for keeping the
works in the collection are in the public domain in the United
www.gutenberg.org/license.
you share it without charge with others.
















  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the address specified in
  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation. Royalty payments must be paid
  License. You must require such a user to return or destroy all
  Literary Archive Foundation."
  Section 4, "Information about donations to the Project Gutenberg
  agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the Project
  all use of and all access to other copies of Project Gutenberg-tm
  any money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
  copies of the works possessed in a physical medium and discontinue
  distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.
  does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
  electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days of
  legally required to prepare) your periodic tax returns. Royalty
  payments should be clearly marked as such and sent to the Project
  receipt of the work.
  the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
  to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he has
  within 60 days following each date on which you prepare (or are
  works.
  you already use to calculate your applicable taxes. The fee is owed
  you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
(www.gutenberg.org), you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense
* You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
* You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
* You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
* You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of
1.E.5. Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
1.E.6. You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
1.E.7. Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
1.E.8. You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
1.E.9. If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project
1.F.
1.F.1. Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
1.F.2. LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
1.F.3. LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
1.F.4. Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
1.F.5. Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
1.F.6. INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
DAMAGE.
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.
Gutenberg-tm collection. Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm
Gutenberg-tm electronic work or group of works on different terms than
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.
OTHER WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3. YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
Vanilla ASCII" or other form. Any alternate format must include the
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
agreement shall be interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or
any word processing or hypertext form. However, if you provide access
are set forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing
cannot be read by your equipment.
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including
contain "Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate
damages. If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
electronic works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may
fees. YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
forth in Section 3 below.
from the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the manager of
full Project Gutenberg-tm License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO
intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
lieu of a refund. If you received the work electronically, the person
limitation permitted by the applicable state law. The invalidity or
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
of obtaining a copy upon request, of the work in its original "Plain
opportunity to receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund. If
or corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other
or entity providing it to you may choose to give you a second
other medium, a computer virus, or computer codes that damage or
other than "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
provided that:
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium
remaining provisions.
the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark. Contact the Foundation as set
the second copy is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing
to or distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format
to the user, provide a copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means
unenforceability of any provision of this agreement shall not void the
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.
version posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm website
violates the law of the state applicable to this agreement, the
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of
with the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in
with your written explanation. The person or entity that provided you
without further opportunities to fix the problem.
works not protected by U.S. copyright law in creating the Project
written explanation to the person you received the work from. If you



















($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
Archive Foundation
Archive Foundation and how your efforts and donations can help, see
Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent permitted by
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any particular
Defect you cause.
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
Gutenberg-tm concept of a library of electronic works that could be
International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
Literary Archive Foundation
Most people start at our website which has the main PG search
Please check the Project Gutenberg web pages for current donation
Professor Michael S. Hart was the originator of the Project
Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without
Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
Revenue Service. The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887. Email contact links and up
Section 2. Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm
Section 3. Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary
Section 4. Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Section 5. General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
Sections 3 and 4 and the Foundation information page at
States. Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
The Foundation's business office is located at 809 North 1500 West,
The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non-profit
This website includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.
Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
accordance with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the
additions or deletions to any Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
and official page at www.gutenberg.org/contact
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
approach us with offers to donate.
array of equipment including outdated equipment. Many small donations
assistance they need are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
computers including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers. It
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
distributed Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of
donate, please visit: www.gutenberg.org/donate
edition.
editions, all of which are confirmed as not protected by copyright in
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of
electronic works, harmless from all liability, costs and expenses,
exists because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations
facility: www.gutenberg.org
freely distributed in machine-readable form accessible by the widest
freely shared with anyone. For forty years, he produced and
from people in all walks of life.
generations. To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
including legal fees, that arise directly or indirectly from any of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
methods and addresses. Donations are accepted in a number of other
necessarily keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper
number is 64-6221541. Contributions to the Project Gutenberg Literary
or any Project Gutenberg-tm work, (b) alteration, modification, or
outside the United States. U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.
production, promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in
remain freely available for generations to come. In 2001, the Project
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
state visit www.gutenberg.org/donate
status with the IRS.
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
the U.S. unless a copyright notice is included. Thus, we do not
the following which you do or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this
to date contact information can be found at the Foundation's website
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
volunteer support.
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations. To
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance. To SEND
widespread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
with these requirements. We do not solicit donations in locations
www.gutenberg.org
a	695
abide	2
able	1
about	102
above	3
absence	1
absurd	2
accept	1
acceptance	1
accepted	2
accepting	1
access	10
accessed	1
accessible	1
accident	2
accidentally	1
accordance	2
account	1
accounting	1
accounts	1
accusation	1
accustomed	1
ache	1
across	5
act	1
active	2
actual	1
actually	1
ada	1
added	23
adding	1
addition	1
additional	3
additions	1
address	1
addressed	2
addresses	1
addressing	1
adjourn	1
adoption	1
advance	3
advantage	3
adventures	11
advice	3
advisable	2
advise	1
affair	1
affectionately	1
afford	1
afore	1
afraid	12
after	43
afterwards	2
again	83
against	10
age	4
aged	1
agent	1
ago	2
agony	1
agree	11
agreed	1
agreement	18
ah	5
ahem	1
air	15
airs	1
alarm	2
alarmed	1
alas	4
alice	403
alive	3
all	200
allow	4
almost	8
alone	5
along	6
aloud	5
already	3
also	4
alteration	1
altered	1
alternate	1
alternately	1
altogether	5
always	13
am	16
ambition	1
among	12
an	62
ancient	1
and	942
anger	2
angrily	9
angry	5
animal	2
animals	4
ann	4
annoy	1
annoyed	1
another	22
answer	9
answered	4
answers	1
antipathies	1
anxious	3
anxiously	14
any	76
anyone	5
anything	22
anywhere	3
appealed	1
appear	3
appearance	1
appeared	8
appearing	2
appears	1
applause	1
apple	1
apples	2
applicable	3
apply	1
approach	1
arch	1
archbishop	2
arches	4
archive	13
are	77
argue	1
argued	1
argument	4
arguments	1
arise	1
arithmetic	1
arm	15
arms	6
around	3
arranged	1
array	1
arrived	1
arrow	1
arrum	1
arthur	1
as	274
ascii	2
ashamed	2
ask	11
askance	1
asked	17
asking	5
asleep	8
assembled	2
assistance	1
associated	8
at	225
ate	1
atheling	1
atom	2
attached	1
attempt	1
attempted	1
attempts	1
attended	1
attending	3
attends	1
audibly	1
australia	1
author	1
authority	2
available	2
avoid	1
away	28
awfully	1
axes	1
axis	1
b	2
baby	14
back	39
backs	1
bad	2
bag	1
baked	1
balanced	1
balls	1
bank	3
banks	1
banquet	1
bark	2
barking	1
barley	1
barrowful	2
based	2
bat	3
bathing	1
bats	4
bawled	1
be	167
beak	1
bear	2
beast	1
beasts	2
beat	4
beating	2
beau	4
beauti	1
beautiful	13
beautifully	2
beautify	1
became	2
because	16
become	5
becoming	1
bed	1
beds	2
bee	1
been	38
before	42
beg	8
began	58
begged	1
begin	13
beginning	15
begins	4
begun	7
behead	1
beheaded	3
beheading	1
behind	13
being	19
believe	9
believed	1
bells	1
belong	1
belongs	2
beloved	1
below	6
belt	1
bend	2
bent	1
besides	4
best	12
better	14
between	6
bill	18
binary	1
bird	2
birds	10
birthday	1
bit	16
bite	2
bitter	1
blacking	1
blades	1
blame	1
blasts	2
bleeds	1
blew	2
blow	2
blown	1
blows	1
blue	1
body	2
boldly	1
bone	1
bones	1
book	11
books	2
boon	1
boots	4
bore	1
both	15
bother	1
bottle	10
bottom	4
bough	1
bound	3
bowed	4
bowing	1
box	10
boxed	1
boy	3
brain	1
branch	1
branches	2
brandy	1
brass	1
brave	1
breach	2
bread	7
break	2
breath	4
breathe	3
breeze	1
bright	8
brightened	2
bring	3
bringing	3
bristling	1
broke	2
broken	6
brother	1
brought	3
brown	2
brush	1
brushing	1
burn	2
burning	1
burnt	1
burst	1
bursting	1
busily	4
business	8
busy	2
but	174
butter	9
buttercup	1
buttered	1
butterfly	1
buttons	1
by	86
bye	2
c	5
cackled	1
cake	3
cakes	3
calculate	1
calculated	1
call	9
called	15
calling	1
calmly	1
came	40
camomile	1
can	73
canary	1
candle	3
cannot	5
canterbury	1
canvas	1
capering	1
capital	4
card	1
cardboard	1
cards	3
care	4
carefully	3
cares	2
carried	4
carrier	1
carroll	3
carry	2
carrying	2
cart	1
cartwheels	1
case	5
cat	37
catch	4
catching	2
caterpillar	29
cats	13
cattle	1
caucus	4
caught	3
cauldron	2
cause	5
caused	2
cautiously	3
cease	1
ceiling	1
centre	1
certain	5
certainly	14
chain	1
chains	1
chair	1
chance	4
chanced	1
change	15
changed	8
changes	2
changing	2
chapter	24
character	2
charge	6
charges	2
charitable	1
charities	1
chatte	1
cheap	1
cheated	1
check	4
checked	3
checks	1
cheeks	1
cheered	3
cheerfully	1
cherry	1
cheshire	7
chief	1
child	11
childhood	1
children	10
chimney	6
chimneys	1
chin	7
choice	2
choke	1
choked	3
choking	1
choose	1
choosing	1
chop	1
chorus	6
chose	2
christmas	1
chrysalis	1
chuckled	1
circle	1
circumstances	1
city	1
civil	3
claim	1
clamour	1
clapping	1
clasped	1
classics	1
claws	2
clean	1
clear	2
cleared	1
clearer	1
clearly	2
clever	2
climb	1
clinging	1
clock	5
close	13
closed	2
closely	1
closer	1
clubs	1
coast	1
coaxing	2
codes	1
coils	1
cold	1
collar	1
collected	2
collection	4
come	47
comes	2
comfits	2
comfort	1
comfortable	1
comfortably	1
coming	9
commercial	1
committed	1
common	1
commotion	1
company	1
compilation	1
complained	1
complaining	1
completely	1
compliance	5
comply	6
complying	3
compressed	1
computer	2
computers	2
concept	2
concerning	2
concert	2
concluded	2
conclusion	2
condemn	1
conduct	1
confirmation	1
confirmed	1
confused	4
confusing	3
confusion	5
conger	1
conqueror	2
conquest	1
consented	1
consequential	1
consider	4
considerable	2
considered	3
considering	3
constant	3
consultation	1
contact	4
contain	2
containing	1
contempt	1
contemptuous	1
contemptuously	2
content	1
contents	1
continued	9
contract	1
contradicted	1
contributions	2
conversation	9
conversations	2
convert	1
cook	13
cool	2
copied	2
copies	7
copy	12
copying	4
copyright	20
corner	4
corners	1
corporation	1
corrupt	1
cost	4
costs	2
could	78
couldn	9
counting	1
countries	1
country	5
couple	1
couples	1
courage	3
course	27
court	18
courtiers	2
coward	1
crab	3
crash	3
crashed	1
crawled	1
crawling	1
crazy	1
created	2
creating	4
creation	1
creature	4
creatures	10
credit	1
creep	1
crept	1
cried	20
cries	1
crimson	2
critical	1
crocodile	1
croquet	10
croqueted	1
croqueting	1
cross	3
crossed	3
crossly	1
crouched	1
crowd	4
crowded	5
crown	3
crumbs	4
crust	1
cry	3
crying	2
cucumber	2
cunning	1
cup	2
cupboards	2
cur	1
curiosity	5
curious	19
curiouser	2
curled	2
curls	1
curly	1
currants	1
current	1
curtain	1
curtsey	1
curtseying	1
curving	1
cushion	2
custard	1
custody	2
cut	5
cutting	1
d	30
dainties	1
daisies	1
daisy	1
damage	2
damaged	1
damages	4
dance	13
dancing	2
dare	5
daresay	1
dark	3
darkness	1
data	1
date	3
dates	1
daughter	1
david	1
day	29
days	8
dead	4
deal	12
dear	29
dears	3
death	1
decided	3
decidedly	4
declare	2
declared	1
deductible	1
deep	7
deepest	1
deeply	4
defect	3
defective	3
defects	1
delay	1
deletions	1
delight	3
delighted	2
delightful	2
demand	1
denial	1
denied	2
denies	1
deny	2
denying	1
depends	2
derision	1
derivative	3
derive	1
derived	1
described	1
deserved	1
desk	1
desks	1
despair	1
desperate	1
desperately	1
despite	1
destroy	2
detach	1
determine	1
diamonds	1
dibianca	1
did	63
didn	14
die	1
died	1
different	10
difficult	2
difficulties	1
difficulty	4
dig	1
digging	4
diligently	1
dinah	14
dinn	2
dinner	2
dipped	2
direct	1
directed	2
direction	5
directions	3
directly	3
disagree	1
disappeared	2
disappointment	1
disclaim	1
disclaimer	3
disclaimers	1
discontinue	1
discover	1
discovered	1
disgust	1
dish	4
dishes	2
disk	1
dismay	1
disobey	1
display	1
displayed	1
displaying	4
dispute	2
distance	8
distant	2
distraction	1
distribute	6
distributed	4
distributing	7
distribution	6
distributor	1
dive	1
do	97
dodged	1
dodo	13
does	11
doesn	16
dog	3
dogs	3
doing	5
domain	2
don	61
donate	5
donation	1
donations	15
done	15
donors	1
door	30
doors	2
doorway	1
dormouse	40
doth	3
double	1
doubled	1
doubling	1
doubt	4
doubtful	2
doubtfully	2
down	103
downloading	1
downward	1
downwards	1
doze	1
dozing	1
draggled	1
draw	7
drawing	1
drawling	3
dreadful	2
dreadfully	6
dream	7
dreamed	1
dreaming	1
dreamy	1
dressed	1
drew	5
dried	1
driest	1
drink	7
drinking	1
dripping	1
drive	2
drop	1
dropped	5
dropping	1
drowned	1
drunk	2
dry	8
duchess	42
duck	4
dull	3
dunce	1
e	29
each	9
eager	3
eagerly	8
eaglet	3
ear	6
earls	2
earnestly	2
ears	5
earth	4
easily	4
easy	3
eat	18
eaten	1
eating	1
eats	1
ebook	13
ebooks	7
edgar	1
edge	3
edition	2
editions	6
educational	1
educations	1
edwin	2
eel	2
eels	1
effect	3
effort	2
efforts	3
egg	1
eggs	5
eh	1
ein	1
either	11
elbow	3
elbows	1
elect	1
electronic	27
electronically	2
elegant	1
eleventh	1
else	12
elsie	1
em	3
email	2
emphasis	1
employee	1
employees	1
empty	1
encoding	1
encourage	1
encouraged	1
encouraging	2
end	19
ending	2
energetic	1
engaged	1
engine	1
england	1
english	7
engraved	1
enjoy	1
ennyworth	1
enormous	1
enough	18
ensuring	1
entangled	2
entirely	2
entity	3
entrance	1
equipment	3
errors	1
escape	4
especially	1
esq	1
est	1
even	20
evening	5
ever	22
every	12
everybody	8
everything	14
evidence	8
evidently	1
exact	1
exactly	8
examine	2
examining	1
excellent	2
except	8
exclaimed	6
exclamation	1
exclusion	1
execute	1
executed	6
executes	1
execution	3
executioner	6
executions	2
exempt	2
existence	1
exists	1
expected	1
expecting	3
expend	1
expense	1
expenses	2
experiment	2
explain	10
explained	1
explanation	4
explanations	1
exporting	1
express	1
expressing	1
expression	1
extent	1
extra	1
extraordinary	2
extras	1
extremely	2
eye	7
eyed	1
eyelids	1
eyes	29
f	11
face	15
faces	5
facility	1
fact	8
fading	1
failure	1
faint	1
fainting	1
faintly	1
fair	1
fairly	1
fairy	1
fall	7
fallen	4
falling	2
familiarly	1
family	1
fan	10
fancied	2
fancy	7
fancying	1
fanned	1
fanning	1
far	13
farm	1
farmer	1
farther	1
fashion	2
fast	4
faster	3
fat	1
father	6
favoured	1
favourite	1
fear	4
feared	1
feather	1
feathers	1
federal	2
fee	8
feeble	2
feebly	1
feel	8
feeling	7
feelings	2
fees	4
feet	19
fell	6
fellow	4
fellows	1
felt	23
fender	1
ferrets	2
fetch	7
few	10
fidgeted	1
field	1
fifteen	1
fifteenth	1
fifth	1
fig	1
fight	2
fighting	1
figure	3
figures	1
file	2
files	2
filled	3
fills	1
financial	1
find	21
finding	3
finds	1
fine	2
finger	5
finish	5
finished	12
finishing	1
fire	4
fireplace	1
first	51
fish	8
fishes	1
fit	3
fitness	1
fits	1
fitted	1
five	8
fix	2
fixed	1
flame	1
flamingo	5
flamingoes	2
flapper	1
flappers	1
flashed	1
flat	2
flavour	1
flew	1
flinging	1
flock	1
floor	3
flower	2
flowers	2
flown	1
flung	1
flurry	1
flustered	1
fluttered	1
fly	3
flying	1
folded	3
folding	1
follow	3
followed	8
following	4
follows	3
fond	4
foolish	1
foot	10
footman	14
footmen	1
footsteps	2
for	179
forehead	2
forepaws	1
forget	2
forgetting	3
forgot	2
forgotten	6
fork	1
form	5
format	4
formats	2
forth	8
fortunately	1
forty	2
forwards	1
found	35
foundation	25
fountains	2
four	8
fourteenth	1
fourth	1
frame	1
frames	1
france	1
free	8
freely	4
french	4
friend	3
friends	2
fright	2
frighten	1
frightened	7
frog	3
from	52
front	2
frontispiece	1
frowning	4
frying	1
ful	1
fulcrum	1
full	19
fumbled	1
fun	3
funny	3
fur	3
furious	1
furiously	1
furrow	1
furrows	1
further	4
fury	3
future	3
gained	1
gallons	1
game	13
games	1
garden	16
gardeners	8
gather	1
gave	15
gay	1
gazing	1
general	6
generally	7
generations	2
gently	3
geography	1
get	46
getting	22
giddy	2
girl	4
girls	3
give	16
given	2
giving	2
glad	11
glanced	1
glaring	1
glass	10
globe	1
gloomily	1
gloves	11
go	50
goals	1
goes	7
going	27
golden	7
goldfish	2
gone	13
good	27
goose	2
got	45
govern	1
graceful	1
grammar	1
grand	3
grant	1
granted	1
grass	4
gratefully	1
grave	3
gravely	3
gravy	1
grazed	1
great	39
green	4
grew	1
grey	1
grief	1
grin	6
grinned	3
grinning	1
grins	1
gross	1
ground	9
group	1
grow	13
growing	11
growl	3
growled	1
growling	1
growls	1
grown	7
grumbled	1
grunt	1
grunted	4
gryphon	55
guard	1
guess	3
guessed	3
guests	3
guilt	1
guinea	6
gutenberg	98
had	178
hadn	8
hair	7
half	23
hall	9
hand	21
handed	3
hands	12
handsome	1
handwriting	1
hanging	3
happen	8
happened	7
happening	1
happens	5
happy	1
hard	8
hardly	12
hare	31
harm	1
harmless	1
hart	1
has	9
hasn	2
haste	1
hastily	16
hat	1
hatching	1
hate	2
hated	1
hatter	56
hatters	1
have	87
haven	8
having	10
he	128
head	50
heads	10
heap	1
hear	15
heard	30
hearing	4
heart	2
hearth	1
hearthrug	1
hearts	8
heavy	2
hedge	2
hedgehog	7
hedgehogs	3
hedges	1
heels	1
height	5
held	4
help	12
helped	1
helpless	1
her	248
herald	1
here	51
hers	4
herself	83
hid	1
hide	1
high	16
highest	1
him	43
himself	6
hint	2
hippopotamus	1
his	96
hiss	1
histories	1
history	7
hit	2
hjckrrh	1
hm	1
hoarse	3
hoarsely	1
hold	11
holder	4
holding	3
hole	6
holiday	1
hollow	1
home	5
honest	1
honour	4
hookah	5
hope	4
hoped	1
hopeful	1
hopeless	1
hoping	3
horse	1
hot	7
hour	2
hours	4
house	18
housemaid	1
houses	1
how	72
however	21
howled	1
howling	3
https	1
humble	1
humbly	2
hundred	1
hundreds	1
hung	1
hungry	3
hunting	3
hurried	11
hurriedly	2
hurry	11
hurrying	1
hurt	3
hush	3
hypertext	1
i	546
idea	15
identification	1
identify	1
idiot	1
idiotic	1
if	118
ignorant	1
ii	2
iii	2
ill	2
illustration	1
imagine	2
imitated	1
immediate	3
immediately	3
immense	1
impatient	1
impatiently	5
impertinent	1
implied	2
important	10
imposed	1
impossible	3
improve	1
in	435
inaccurate	1
incessantly	1
inches	6
incidental	1
inclined	1
include	1
included	3
includes	1
including	9
incomplete	1
increasing	1
indeed	16
indemnify	1
indemnity	1
indicate	1
indicating	1
indignant	1
indignantly	4
indirect	1
indirectly	1
individual	4
information	8
infringement	1
injure	1
ink	1
inkstand	1
inquired	1
inquisitively	1
inside	2
insolence	1
instance	3
instantly	5
instead	3
insult	1
intellectual	2
interest	1
interesting	5
internal	1
international	1
interpreted	1
interrupt	1
interrupted	9
interrupting	2
into	67
introduce	2
introduced	1
invalidity	1
invent	1
invented	1
invitation	2
invited	2
involved	1
inwards	1
irons	1
irritated	1
irs	1
is	131
isn	7
it	610
its	60
itself	14
iv	2
ix	2
jack	1
january	1
jar	2
jaw	1
jaws	2
jelly	1
jogged	1
join	9
joined	3
journey	1
joys	1
judge	4
judging	1
jug	1
jumped	6
jumping	4
juror	1
jurors	4
jury	22
jurymen	4
just	52
justice	1
keep	13
keeping	4
kept	13
kettle	1
key	9
kick	3
kid	5
kill	1
killing	1
kills	1
kind	8
kindly	2
king	63
kings	1
kiss	1
kissed	1
kitchen	4
knave	9
knee	5
kneel	1
knelt	1
knew	15
knife	3
knock	1
knocked	1
knocking	3
knot	2
know	88
knowing	2
knowledge	3
known	1
knows	2
knuckles	1
label	2
labelled	1
lacie	1
lad	1
ladder	1
lady	3
laid	2
lake	1
lamps	1
land	1
language	1
languid	1
lap	2
large	33
larger	7
largest	1
lark	1
last	33
lasted	2
lastly	1
late	6
lately	1
later	3
latin	1
latitude	2
laugh	1
laughed	2
laughing	2
laughter	1
law	9
laws	10
lay	4
lazily	1
lazy	1
leaders	1
leading	1
leaning	2
leant	1
leap	1
learn	8
learned	1
learning	2
learnt	2
least	9
leave	9
leaves	6
leaving	1
led	4
ledge	1
left	14
lefthand	2
legal	2
legally	1
legged	2
legs	3
length	1
less	4
lessen	1
lesson	3
lessons	10
lest	1
let	22
letter	3
letters	1
lewis	3
liability	3
liable	1
library	1
license	18
licensed	1
licking	1
lie	2
lieu	2
life	13
lifted	1
like	85
liked	6
likely	5
likes	1
limbs	1
limitation	3
limited	5
line	2
lines	1
linked	2
links	3
lips	1
list	3
listen	7
listened	1
listeners	1
listening	3
lit	1
literary	13
little	129
live	8
lived	3
livery	3
lives	4
living	2
lizard	6
ll	57
lobster	8
lobsters	7
located	7
locations	1
lock	1
locked	1
locks	2
lodging	1
london	1
lonely	2
long	34
longed	2
longer	3
longitude	2
look	29
looked	45
looking	32
loose	2
lory	7
lose	1
losing	1
lost	3
lot	1
loud	6
louder	1
loudly	3
love	3
loveliest	1
lovely	2
loving	1
low	15
lower	1
lowing	1
luckily	2
lullaby	1
lying	8
m	63
ma	3
mabel	4
machine	1
machines	1
mad	16
made	30
magic	1
magpie	1
mail	1
main	1
maintaining	1
majesty	12
make	30
makes	12
making	8
mallets	1
man	5
manage	7
managed	4
manager	1
managing	1
manner	2
manners	1
many	14
maps	1
march	34
marched	1
mark	3
marked	8
marmalade	1
mary	4
master	4
matter	9
matters	2
maximum	1
may	28
maybe	2
mayn	1
me	68
meal	1
mean	10
meaning	8
means	8
meant	5
meanwhile	1
measure	1
meat	1
medium	5
meekly	2
meet	3
meeting	1
melancholy	6
memorandum	1
memory	1
men	1
mentioned	3
merchantability	1
mercia	2
merely	2
merrily	1
messages	2
met	4
method	1
methods	1
mice	4
michael	1
middle	8
might	28
mile	2
miles	3
milk	2
millennium	1
mind	11
minded	1
minding	1
mine	10
mineral	1
minute	21
minutes	11
mischief	1
miserable	2
miss	4
missed	2
mission	4
mississippi	1
mistake	3
mixed	2
mock	57
moderate	1
modern	1
modification	1
modified	1
moment	31
money	3
month	2
moon	1
moral	8
morals	1
morcar	2
more	50
morning	5
morsel	1
most	14
mostly	2
mournful	1
mournfully	1
mouse	44
mouth	10
mouths	4
move	3
moved	5
moving	3
much	52
muchness	3
muddle	1
multiplication	1
murder	1
murdering	1
muscular	1
mushroom	8
music	3
must	54
mustard	3
muttered	2
muttering	3
my	58
myself	7
mystery	2
name	11
named	1
names	2
narrow	2
nasty	1
natural	4
natured	1
naturedly	1
nay	1
near	15
nearer	5
nearly	13
neat	1
neatly	2
necessarily	1
neck	7
need	1
needn	3
needs	1
negligence	1
neighbour	1
neighbouring	1
neither	2
nervous	5
nest	1
network	1
never	48
nevertheless	1
new	8
newsletter	1
newspapers	1
next	30
nibbled	2
nibbling	3
nice	6
nicely	2
night	5
nile	1
nine	5
no	100
nobody	8
nodded	1
noise	3
noises	1
non	1
none	4
nonproprietary	1
nonsense	7
nor	3
normans	1
north	1
northumbria	2
nose	8
not	173
note	2
nothing	34
notice	8
noticed	8
noticing	1
notifies	1
notion	3
now	60
nowhere	2
number	8
nurse	3
nursing	3
o	7
obliged	3
oblong	1
obsolete	1
obstacle	1
obtain	3
obtaining	2
occasional	1
occasionally	1
occur	1
occurred	2
october	1
odd	1
of	638
off	73
offend	1
offended	10
offer	2
offers	1
office	1
officer	1
officers	4
official	3
often	6
oh	45
ointment	1
old	21
older	2
oldest	1
on	204
once	34
one	106
ones	1
oneself	1
onions	1
online	4
only	52
oop	7
ootiful	4
open	7
opened	10
opening	3
opinion	1
opportunities	1
opportunity	9
opposite	1
or	155
orange	1
order	3
ordered	4
ordering	2
org	10
organized	1
original	1
originator	1
ornamented	2
other	57
others	8
otherwise	4
ought	14
our	12
ours	1
ourselves	1
out	118
outdated	1
outside	6
over	40
overcome	1
overhead	1
owed	1
owl	3
own	10
owner	4
owns	2
oyster	1
p	1
pace	1
pack	5
page	2
pages	1
paid	6
paint	1
painting	2
pair	5
pairs	1
pale	4
pan	1
panted	1
panther	3
panting	2
paper	5
paperwork	1
paragraph	11
paragraphs	3
parchment	2
pardon	6
pardoned	1
paris	2
part	6
particular	6
particularly	1
partner	1
partners	1
parts	3
party	12
pass	1
passage	4
passed	5
passing	1
passion	3
passionate	1
past	3
pat	3
patience	1
patiently	2
patriotic	1
patted	1
pattering	3
pattern	1
pause	2
paused	1
paw	3
paws	4
pay	1
paying	3
payments	3
pebbles	2
peeped	3
peeping	1
peering	1
pegs	1
pence	1
pencil	2
pencils	1
pennyworth	1
people	16
pepper	9
perfectly	4
perform	1
performances	1
performed	1
performing	3
perhaps	17
periodic	1
permanent	1
permission	6
permitted	3
persisted	2
person	8
personal	2
persons	1
pet	1
pg	1
pglaf	1
phrase	4
physical	2
picked	3
picking	2
picture	1
pictured	1
pictures	4
pie	3
piece	6
pieces	3
pig	12
pigeon	12
pigs	6
pinch	2
pinched	2
pine	1
pink	1
piteous	1
pitied	1
pity	3
place	9
placed	1
places	2
plain	2
plainly	1
plan	4
planning	1
plate	3
plates	2
play	8
played	1
players	4
playing	2
pleaded	3
pleasant	1
pleasanter	1
please	22
pleased	7
pleases	1
pleasing	1
pleasure	2
plenty	2
pocket	7
pointed	1
pointing	4
poison	3
poker	1
poky	1
politely	6
pool	12
poor	27
pop	1
pope	1
porpoise	4
position	2
positively	1
possessed	1
possession	1
possibility	1
possible	1
possibly	3
posted	4
pot	1
pounds	1
pour	1
poured	1
powdered	1
practically	1
practice	1
pray	3
precious	1
prepare	2
present	3
presented	1
presently	2
presents	2
preserve	1
pressed	3
pressing	1
pretend	1
pretending	1
pretexts	1
prettier	1
pretty	1
prevent	2
previous	1
print	1
printed	3
prison	1
prisoner	2
prize	1
prizes	5
problem	1
proceed	2
processing	1
procession	5
processions	1
produce	1
produced	3
producing	1
production	1
professor	1
profit	1
profits	1
prohibition	1
project	88
prominently	2
promise	1
promised	1
promising	1
promoting	2
promotion	1
pronounced	1
proofread	1
proper	3
property	2
proposal	1
proprietary	1
prosecute	1
protect	2
protected	5
protection	1
proud	2
prove	1
proved	2
proves	2
provide	7
provided	4
providing	4
provision	1
provisions	1
provoking	1
public	3
puffed	1
pulled	1
pulling	1
pun	1
punching	1
punished	1
punitive	1
puppy	7
purple	1
purpose	3
purring	2
push	1
puss	1
put	31
putting	3
puzzle	1
puzzled	9
puzzling	4
quadrille	5
quarrel	1
quarrelled	1
quarrelling	2
queen	76
queens	1
queer	12
queerest	1
question	17
questions	4
quick	2
quicker	1
quickly	2
quiet	2
quietly	5
quite	55
quiver	1
rabbit	53
rabbits	1
race	7
railway	2
raised	2
raising	1
ran	16
rapidly	2
rapped	1
rat	1
rate	9
rather	25
rats	1
rattle	1
rattling	2
raven	1
ravens	1
raving	2
raw	1
re	40
reach	4
reaching	2
read	14
readable	2
readily	1
reading	4
ready	8
real	3
reality	1
really	13
rearing	1
reason	9
reasonable	2
reasons	1
receipt	2
receive	2
received	6
receiving	1
recently	1
recognised	1
recovered	2
red	3
redistribute	1
redistributing	2
redistribution	2
reduced	1
reeds	1
reeling	1
references	2
refreshments	1
refund	10
refused	1
registered	2
regular	2
regulating	1
release	1
relief	2
relieved	1
remain	2
remained	3
remaining	2
remark	10
remarkable	2
remarked	10
remarking	3
remarks	3
remedies	2
remember	14
remembered	5
remembering	1
reminding	1
remove	1
removed	4
renamed	1
repeat	7
repeated	10
repeating	3
replace	1
replacement	5
replied	29
reply	5
reported	1
reports	1
representations	1
request	1
require	1
required	1
requirements	4
research	2
resource	1
respect	1
respectable	1
respectful	1
rest	10
resting	2
restrictions	2
result	1
retire	1
return	3
returned	2
returning	1
returns	1
revenue	1
rich	1
riddle	1
riddles	2
ridge	1
ridges	1
ridiculous	1
right	36
righthand	1
rightly	1
ring	2
ringlets	2
riper	1
rippling	1
rise	1
rises	1
rising	1
roared	1
roast	1
rock	1
rocket	1
rome	2
roof	6
room	13
roots	2
rope	1
rose	5
roses	3
roughly	1
round	41
row	2
royal	2
royalties	3
royalty	3
rubbed	1
rubbing	2
rude	2
rudeness	1
rule	5
rules	4
rumbling	1
run	4
running	8
rush	2
rushed	1
rustled	1
rustling	1
s	222
sad	3
sadly	5
safe	2
sage	1
said	462
salmon	1
salt	3
same	25
sand	1
sands	1
sang	2
sat	17
saucepan	1
saucepans	1
saucer	1
savage	4
save	1
saves	1
saw	14
say	51
saying	15
says	4
scale	1
scaly	1
school	6
schoolroom	1
scolded	1
scrambling	1
scratching	1
scream	2
screamed	4
screaming	1
scroll	2
sea	14
seals	1
seaography	1
search	2
seaside	1
seated	1
second	6
secondly	2
secret	1
section	7
sections	1
secure	1
see	70
seeing	1
seem	8
seemed	27
seems	5
seen	15
seldom	1
sell	2
send	2
sending	3
sends	2
sensation	2
sense	3
sent	3
sentence	8
sentenced	1
series	1
seriously	1
serpent	9
serpents	3
service	1
set	23
setting	1
settle	1
settled	3
settling	1
seven	6
several	5
severely	4
severity	1
sh	2
shade	1
shake	1
shakespeare	1
shaking	3
shall	27
shan	6
shape	1
shaped	3
share	2
shared	2
sharing	2
shark	1
sharks	1
sharp	6
sharply	4
she	553
shedding	1
sheep	1
shelves	2
shepherd	1
shifting	1
shilling	1
shillings	1
shingle	1
shining	1
shiny	1
shiver	1
shock	1
shoes	7
shook	9
shore	4
short	4
shorter	2
should	29
shoulder	4
shoulders	4
shouldn	5
shouted	9
shouting	2
show	3
shower	2
showing	2
shriek	5
shrieked	1
shrieks	1
shrill	5
shrimp	1
shrink	1
shrinking	4
shut	5
shutting	2
shy	1
shyly	1
side	17
sides	4
sigh	4
sighed	5
sighing	3
sight	10
sign	1
signed	2
signifies	1
signify	1
silence	14
silent	7
simple	5
simpleton	1
simply	3
since	4
sing	6
singers	2
singing	2
sink	1
sir	7
sister	9
sisters	2
sit	8
sits	1
sitting	10
six	2
sixpence	1
sixteenth	1
size	13
sizes	1
skimming	1
skirt	1
skurried	1
sky	5
slate	4
slates	8
sleep	6
sleepy	5
slightest	1
slipped	3
slippery	1
slowly	8
sluggard	1
small	12
smaller	3
smallest	2
smile	2
smiled	2
smiling	2
smoke	1
smoking	2
snail	3
snappishly	1
snatch	2
sneeze	2
sneezed	1
sneezes	2
sneezing	6
snorting	1
snout	1
so	153
sob	1
sobbed	1
sobbing	3
sobs	4
soft	1
softly	1
soldier	1
soldiers	10
solemn	3
solemnly	4
soles	1
solicit	2
solicitation	1
solid	1
some	52
somebody	7
somehow	1
someone	1
somersault	2
something	18
sometimes	5
somewhere	3
son	1
song	7
soo	7
soon	25
sooner	2
soothing	1
sorrow	2
sorrowful	2
sorrows	1
sorry	1
sort	20
sorts	3
sound	4
sounded	5
sounds	4
soup	18
sour	1
spades	1
speak	15
speaker	1
speaking	5
special	1
specified	2
spectacles	3
speech	3
speed	1
spell	1
spirited	1
spite	1
splash	1
splashed	1
splashing	2
splendidly	1
spoke	17
spoken	1
spoon	2
spot	1
sprawling	1
spread	3
spreading	1
squeaked	1
squeaking	2
squeeze	1
squeezed	1
staff	1
stairs	3
stalk	1
stamping	2
stand	6
standing	1
star	1
staring	3
start	3
started	2
startled	2
state	7
statements	1
states	19
station	1
status	4
stay	5
stays	1
steady	1
steam	1
sternly	1
stick	4
sticks	1
stiff	1
stigand	1
still	13
stingy	1
stirring	2
stockings	1
stole	3
stolen	1
stood	7
stool	1
stoop	2
stop	6
stopped	3
stopping	1
stored	1
story	9
straight	2
straightened	1
straightening	1
strange	5
strength	1
stretched	2
stretching	2
strict	1
strings	1
struck	2
stuff	4
stupid	6
stupidest	1
stupidly	1
subdued	1
subject	7
subjects	1
submitted	1
subscribe	1
succeeded	3
such	47
sudden	5
suddenly	13
suet	1
sugar	2
suit	3
sulkily	2
sulky	3
summer	2
sun	2
supple	1
support	4
suppose	14
suppress	1
suppressed	4
sure	24
surprise	5
surprised	7
survive	1
swallow	1
swallowed	1
swallowing	1
swam	5
swamp	1
sweet	1
swim	5
swimming	2
synonymous	1
t	218
table	18
tail	9
tails	3
take	22
taken	4
takes	3
taking	5
tale	5
tales	1
talk	14
talking	17
taller	2
tart	1
tarts	8
taste	2
tasted	3
tastes	1
taught	4
tax	6
taxes	1
tea	20
teaching	1
teacup	3
teacups	2
teapot	1
tears	12
teases	1
teeth	1
telescope	3
telescopes	1
tell	32
telling	2
tells	2
temper	5
tempered	2
ten	6
terms	23
terribly	1
terrier	1
terror	1
texts	1
than	27
thank	4
thanked	1
that	330
thatched	1
the	1839
their	52
theirs	1
them	88
themselves	3
then	94
there	101
therefore	1
these	17
they	154
thick	1
thimble	4
thin	1
thing	49
things	33
think	53
thinking	11
thirteen	1
this	181
thistle	2
thoroughly	2
those	11
though	11
thought	74
thoughtfully	4
thoughts	2
thousand	2
three	28
threw	2
throat	2
throne	1
through	16
throw	3
throwing	2
thrown	1
thump	2
thunder	1
thunderstorm	1
thus	1
tide	1
tidy	1
tie	1
tied	1
tight	1
till	21
tillie	1
time	71
times	6
timid	3
timidly	9
tinkling	1
tiny	4
tipped	1
tiptoe	2
tired	7
tis	5
title	1
tittered	1
tm	57
to	811
toast	1
today	1
toes	3
toffee	1
together	9
told	6
tomorrow	1
tone	40
tones	2
tongue	4
too	26
took	24
top	8
tops	1
tortoise	3
toss	1
tossing	3
touch	1
tougher	1
towards	1
toys	1
trademark	14
trampled	1
transcribe	1
transcription	1
traps	1
tray	1
treacle	7
treading	2
treat	1
treated	1
treatment	1
tree	9
trees	7
tremble	1
trembled	2
trembling	6
tremulous	1
trial	10
trials	1
trickling	1
tricks	1
tried	19
trims	1
triumphantly	2
trot	1
trotting	2
trouble	6
true	4
trumpet	3
trusts	1
truth	1
truthful	1
try	12
trying	14
tucked	3
tulip	1
tumbled	1
tumbling	2
tunnel	1
tureen	1
turkey	1
turn	11
turned	16
turning	12
turns	3
turtle	60
turtles	2
tut	2
twelfth	1
twelve	4
twentieth	1
twenty	3
twice	5
twinkle	8
twinkled	1
twinkling	4
twist	2
two	40
txt	1
types	1
u	7
ugh	2
uglification	2
uglify	1
uglifying	1
ugly	2
un	2
unable	1
uncivil	1
uncomfortable	4
uncomfortably	1
uncommon	1
uncommonly	1
uncorked	1
under	22
underneath	2
understand	7
understood	1
undertone	2
undo	1
undoing	1
uneasily	2
uneasy	1
unenforceability	1
unfolded	2
unfortunate	3
unhappy	2
uniform	1
unimportant	3
united	15
unjust	1
unless	5
unlink	1
unlocking	1
unpleasant	2
unprotected	1
unrolled	2
unsolicited	1
until	5
untwist	1
unusually	1
unwillingly	1
up	103
updated	2
upon	28
upright	1
upset	3
upsetting	1
upstairs	1
us	15
use	32
used	16
useful	2
user	3
using	8
usual	5
usually	2
usurpation	1
ut	1
utf	1
v	2
vague	1
vanilla	2
vanished	4
vanishing	1
variations	1
variety	1
various	2
ve	44
vegetable	1
velvet	1
venture	3
ventured	4
verdict	4
verse	4
verses	4
version	1
very	145
vi	2
viewed	1
viewing	1
vii	2
viii	2
vinegar	1
violates	1
violence	1
violent	2
violently	4
virus	1
visit	3
voice	48
voices	3
void	1
volunteer	1
volunteers	5
vote	1
vulgar	1
w	1
wag	1
wags	1
waist	1
waistcoat	2
wait	1
waited	11
waiting	9
wake	2
walk	5
walked	10
walking	5
walks	1
walrus	1
wander	1
wandered	2
wandering	2
want	9
wanted	4
wants	2
warning	1
warranties	3
warranty	2
was	359
wash	2
washing	3
wasn	11
waste	1
wasting	2
watch	8
watched	2
watching	3
water	5
waters	1
waving	5
way	58
ways	2
we	43
weak	2
wearily	1
web	1
website	4
week	3
weeks	1
welcome	1
well	63
went	83
wept	1
were	85
weren	1
west	1
wet	2
what	142
whatever	3
whatsoever	2
when	80
whenever	2
where	20
whereupon	1
wherever	2
whether	11
which	56
while	26
whiles	1
whiskers	3
whisper	3
whispered	5
whispers	1
whistle	1
whistling	1
white	30
whiting	8
who	67
whoever	1
whole	13
whom	2
whose	2
why	40
wide	2
wider	1
widespread	1
widest	2
widger	1
wife	1
wig	2
wild	2
wildly	2
will	42
william	8
win	1
wind	2
window	8
wine	2
wings	1
wink	2
winter	1
wise	2
wish	22
with	228
within	6
without	34
witness	10
wits	1
woke	1
woman	2
won	26
wonder	18
wondered	1
wonderful	2
wondering	7
wonderland	7
wood	8
wooden	1
word	11
words	21
wore	1
work	53
works	33
world	9
worm	1
worried	1
worry	1
worse	3
worth	4
would	83
wouldn	13
wow	6
wrapping	1
wretched	2
wriggling	1
write	6
writhing	1
writing	9
written	9
wrong	5
wrote	3
www	10
x	2
xi	2
xii	2
yard	1
yards	1
yawned	2
yawning	2
ye	1
year	2
years	2
yelled	1
yelp	1
yer	4
yes	13
yesterday	3
yet	25
you	486
young	5
your	71
yours	3
yourself	10
youth	6
zealand	1
zigzag	1
zip	1
